`I'm just sorry that he's had this problem at a time when he would surely have had the chance to establish himself in the England side.

`I'm just sorry that he's had this problem at a time when he would surely have had the chance to establish himself in the England side.

Obviously not: but how does this tally with community control?

The wonder is perhaps that he has time to do any writing and research at all after running two companies - PlutoPress (Australia) and PR agency Social Change Media - and with partnerStephanie Dowrick, also a writer, bringing up two children.

Andy has a large input to the design side, having the enjoyment ofbeing able to turn ideas in to reality and then use them to give afinancial return.

Andy has a large input to the design side, having the enjoyment ofbeing able to turn ideas in to reality and then use them to give afinancial return.

I wondered if it was so smart to allow Kaptan to make such good progress.

And the malais on duty, in white helmets, whitegloves, and white gaiters, they also hung around the back of the crowdsto sneak a look, instead of doing a beat of the whole square.

Speich had decided to do a double act with her, for he remarked, `Ja, that he has done.

Any interruption might stop the flow, and if it gave the Colonel pause for thought, and the brain behind the little piggy eyes a chance to work, it might result in an enraged charge.

We'll have to get someone in to do the cooking.'

She's got a real Leicester accent, you know?

I think, would you like to do some er adaptation, you know with a

And er then to Sainsburys to do the shopping.

`And, if you want to carry on looking into it yourself, I've got Melanie Gandell's address for you.

`Defence sources in Britain say the man may have done incalculable damage to the NATO alliance before his exposure last week,' Loretta read.

At this camp we encountered some very friendly snowshoe hares that would take food from our hands.

`the activities… are imaginative, stimulating, and make sense from the language teaching point of view.

I think it is advanced on `George Best', it's got a different, rockier sound to it,' Gedge told Sounds .

Without naming names, there are some bands I work with and if they are doing an interview, I will have to be there in case they don't turn up and I end up making loads of phone calls.

Produced in six bi-monthly parts it gives an up-to-date, comprehensive summary of all decisions on human rights cases heard at the European Court of Human Rights in Strasbourg.

`For eight years, I did my act on stage.

A malpractice law suit and legal fees could make a charitable gesture very costly indeed.

Much knowledge has been accumulated since the antiquarians first started to take an interest, and archaeology has become an increasinglyscientific discipline, using modern techniques such as aerialphotography which has vastly increased the number of known sites, andcarbon dating which has caused radical rethinking of acceptedchronology.

They contracted Riche to do the construction work.

Freight companies will also want to make use of the new business lounges.

The centre also houses the IDB sub-centre of the Northern Ireland Euro Info Centre and is well placed to give information on steps being taken to complete the Single European Market.

However what we don't want er our consultants to get in paranoid about if they don't get that target.

However what we don't want er our consultants to get in paranoid about if they don't get that target.

Let's get all the get the sound, now will you buy this and this is the price you can't do it with advertising.

Let's get all the get the sound, now will you buy this and this is the price you can't do it with advertising.

A reference test was developed in order to control for any difference in the samples of pupils who took the test materials.

Fears of an energy shortfall will lend new weight to calls by PowerGen, the smaller of the two Central ElectricityGenerating Boards, to take over a bigger share of the power market.

The first, deriving also from the Council's first major text, and with little doubt the most decisive for the life ofmost Catholics, was that to make far greater use of the vernacular in the liturgy ( Sacrosanctum Concilium 36 and 54).

My family and I had to wait for three weeks in Bombay before getting a boat for England, but during that time I was able to do some useful PR work with newspapers and radio.

Lord Tucker observed: `I do not question that such a drastic step [closure of the factory]… may be required on thepart of a reasonably prudent employer if the peril to his employees issufficiently grave, and to this extent it must always be a question ofdegree, but, in my view, there was no evidence in the present case which could justify a finding of negligence for failure on the part of therespondents to take this step.'

face continued pressure to keep prices low forthe foreseeable future, former Compaq Computer Corp chief Rod Caniontold Reuter in an interview: `Anybody that wants to be successful in the computer business better be prepared to be very aggressive and have alot of aggressive competition - in that environment, you can predictpricing pressure is not going to ease up;' Canion, now chairman of theHouston-based consulting firm Insource Management Group, says that inhis time at Compaq, customers were willing to pay a little more toensure they got quality and performance but that as the market changed, they believedthey could get quality, performance and low price, and now, `that willnever change.'

face continued pressure to keep prices low forthe foreseeable future, former Compaq Computer Corp chief Rod Caniontold Reuter in an interview: `Anybody that wants to be successful in the computer business better be prepared to be very aggressive and have alot of aggressive competition - in that environment, you can predictpricing pressure is not going to ease up;' Canion, now chairman of theHouston-based consulting firm Insource Management Group, says that inhis time at Compaq, customers were willing to pay a little more toensure they got quality and performance but that as the market changed, they believedthey could get quality, performance and low price, and now, `that willnever change.'

But much still needs to be done to recruit staffat every level (consultant psychiatrists, mental nurses, social workers, teachers, etc.), to up-grade the hospital and residential facilities,particularly for the chronic cases, and to make available a more flexible range of community services to those individuals orfamilies who are coping with mental illness or handicap without resortto hospital care.

A deliberate attempt was made in 1966 to make assistance known and acceptable, when it became known as supplementary benefits.

A deliberate attempt was made in 1966 to make assistance known and acceptable, when it became known as supplementary benefits.

It used to be considered that, if a patient wascompulsorily detained, treatment was then at the discretion of thepsychiatrist in charge of the case because such a person was not alwaysable or willing to give informed consent.

No. 4 Commando positions were being heavilymortared when I arrived, and Jock, my friend of many years ago, took meoff to find some shelter in a dug-out, giving at least some protection from the flying shrapnel.

By night, they made love and shared their dreams.

`Sure thing, honey, take your pick.'

Cameron was shaking with laughter, looking on and making no move to help.

To disappear the young men into their own terrain, make use of every cave and wood (and send them over the water if need be)?

She felt thankful that they were taking no notice of her.

She realized that the child was smiling straight at her but she was too tired to engage with her, too detached to make contact, too hidden to do anything but take a photograph and her fingers felt too weak even to do this.

Gordon sees Ibrox and gets a thrill

But his eyes were still fixed on the little bed, trying to make out any movement in or upon it.

Walking slowly through autumn streets he had been wrestling with the ways in which it appeared to him that Coleridge had made use of a now little known book, Ridley's Tales of the Genii .

The height, whatever, it may be, of the imaginative standard will do no harm; we are commanded to imitate one who is inimitable.'

Now there seems to be little demand for good design, and little chance of getting planning permission when a client who wants quality is found.

The company is celebrating with an increase in the final dividend, payable on July 6, to 3.2p (3p) making a 5 p.c. rise in the full-year payment to 5.8p.

The buoy shielded her from the view of the guards, and she used that advantage to get her breath back.

One of the biggest problems in working with these young people is overcoming their anti-school attitudes and convincingthe former that they do have the ability and the latter that educationis essential if they are to make a success of life.

You need to engage in aerobic exercise three to four times per week in order to make physical progress.

Because in fact to do all of our assignments you probably only need to do an average of one a day.

Because in fact to do all of our assignments you probably only need to do an average of one a day.

Durkheim opened the floodgates and offered what amounted to a radically new way of making sense of social institutions and their inter­relations.

As befits two rival prima donnas , each of these formidable figures gave a characteristically distinctive twist to his version of functionalism.

Jack stepped forward and put his arm round Ludens, the doctor made a washing-his-hands-of-the-matter gesture, and Franca said, `Oh do what you like!'

He couldn't threaten the Soviet Union directlybecause the Soviet Union was a nuclear power and couldn't be threateneder so the course of action he took was intended to be moderate and tosecure the objective solely of removing the missiles from Cuba, not of doing anything about the Cuban government or the regime or anything of that sort.

`All he (the Chancellor) offers the unemployed are derisory schemes that will give small help to 100,000 people.

Aphids , or as they are commonly called, greenfly (and not uncommonly blackfly ), are given a fair description and discussion in question number 1 (see page 123).

Provide a set of cups or beakers of similar size and shape to give experience of sharing, estimating and matching.

There are also many types of picture dominoes (animals, fruit, vegetables, colours, shapes, people) all giving practice in matching.

Their fingers will make an impression - as will the sleeve of their sweater!

8) Why is ACORN of great value to companies making use of direct marketing? (also see later chapter).

I'm doing a handout now.

If you get a correlation of about point seven, it means that you're only accounting for forty nine percent, less thanhalf, of the variants in the other var the other sets of scores Thinkabout it, if it's a positive, if you've got a correlation coefficient of one, what it means is that youaccount for a hundred perc or or sorry, if you're gonna make convert itto a percentage, you times it by a hundred, it's the proportion there.

But it is not political any longer; it's just that more people seem to be doing damage to more people, especially old people, single people, those who live alone.

His allegations were hotly rebutted by Keith Warburton, the sales and marketing consultant who got the scheme off the ground.

If it is proposed to borrow the money for the investment, the DCF yield is the highest interest rate the company can pay without making an overall loss.

As workers in the `caring services' we need to ask ourselves certain questions: are we enabling and supporting people to take control of their own lives or are we disabling, taking the control for ourselves?

As workers in the `caring services' we need to ask ourselves certain questions: are we enabling and supporting people to take control of their own lives or are we disabling, taking the control for ourselves?

You'll have to make a will now then.

We telephoned Mr Hector Charlesworth but he was, as yet, unable to take any remedial action, although I had the distinct impression that he would have liked to do so.

Before you make any statement, either verbally or in writing, make sure you have the facts.

`You appear to be familiar with two groups of the old: the wingeing paranoid dimwits who can think of nothing better to do than queue unnecessarily, and the depraved and corrupt denizens of ffeatherstonehaugh's.

Mr Wright's solicitor, Mr Alasdair Pepper, yesterday told Mr Justice Michael Davies in the High Court that the programme gave a false impression of the resort, misrepresenting the quality and nature of the facilities.

On receipt of the application, the court can dismiss it without giving notice to the creditor and, immediately the application is dismissed, time for compliance with the demand starts to run again.

Been on the drip all night she's got an infectionSo erm I'm just hoping I'm not gonna

Likewise, the Christian mind will make little progress in any direction unless its presuppositionsare completely and consistently renewed by being brought into line withthe whole of God's truth.

He was given no chance to escape, would say nothing at all as to what he was doing living in the graveyard and was locked in a cell at the police-station.

He had seen them at the County Show, where he had gone for the rabbits, all those girls with plaits and scrubbed facesand clean gloves, doing an exhibition ride.

Nails was generally asleep not long after ten,preferring to get up when the sun did, take Firelight out and clean upher stable and do his running practice before going home for breakfast.

Nails was generally asleep not long after ten,preferring to get up when the sun did, take Firelight out and clean upher stable and do his running practice before going home for breakfast.

Anybody whose income is less than this will get full family credit.

Lloyd's needs to get a grip on more `safe' business to offset its increasing tendency to be at the wrong end of big disasters such as Piper Alpha.

Something lands with a soft thump on the concrete, a small death, but he does not pause.

But how to get that information to him?

I thought it just was rubbish, and couldn't do any harm.

It's not much of a job, but these days I wouldn't want to get the push.'

Let me take the dress to Donna while you find something else to put on.'

That was why what happened on the boat makes very little difference to me.

This probably calls for a basic two-part structure, with part one detailing your assumptions, deductions and conclusions, and giving your analysis of the problems, while part two looks at possible alternative courses of action and spells out your `solution'.

Fitzgerald then served out for the set to turnthe match into a real struggle, or so we thought, but Grabb and McEnroestepped up a gear midway through the fourth set to take control.

Let those who do not care for mine use their rejections of them to make their own as explicit and as acknowledged as I am going to try to make mine.

Let those who do not care for mine use their rejections of them to make their own as explicit and as acknowledged as I am going to try to make mine.

Housework is such fragmented work that almost never does the housewife report thinking about the task in hand.

If the answer is no to even one of the above then the product is not truly providing a replacement for the layout artist, that's the human who normally does page makeup.

At this earlier stage Ralph goes into the close and takes a look at the human price of capitalism.

His declared aim was economy and he endeavoured to make use of the natural contours as effectively as possible.

In practice the distribution between the various hospital and community services may have little objective foundation, having developed incrementally over a number of years.

In practice the distribution between the various hospital and community services may have little objective foundation, having developed incrementally over a number of years.

Then arrange to visit the kennels before making a definite booking, so that you can satisfy yourself with the standard of care.

Once the T-bar drag-lift had been invented and installed in Davos in 1934, it was possible to get to runs, which had previously taken a twenty-minute climb to reach, in half a minute.

The penny farthing made its first appearance in 1870 and was ridden round the world in 1884.

The act of giving birth creates the separation of mother and child.

Rose gave a yelp of rage, her arm shot out and Evelyn gave an involuntary cry as the stone caught her on the left shoulder.

Rose gave a yelp of rage, her arm shot out and Evelyn gave an involuntary cry as the stone caught her on the left shoulder.

Concussion will lead us very nicely onto compression and if anybody in your place of work has a head injury at all a knock on their head and they say, most people do don't they?

Er Mr Potter this morning very fairly said to this erm t to the panel that if you do his need assessment which i if you got to the theexercise and stretch every parameter to its very limits, be as generousas you can on every possible criterion, you can get to an allocation for Selby of a hundred and twenty two hectares.

For instance, in November 1990 two brothers in Abbotabad were each sentenced to six years' imprisonment and given a heavy fine for having preached about their faith.

In his last few years Kuypers and Gabriella Ugolini made use of viruses which travel into the nervoussystem and multiply in a pathway so that they cross nervous junctionsand spread detectably along a whole connected system: a quite novellabelling technique whose full potential now remains to be realised.

If either of us get a chance for goal, we will go for it.'

SIR Colin Cowdrey has rushed back early from Asia to take personal control of the Pakistan ball-tampering saga.

Could I just make one suggestion that it's made within the next six months as well.

`They've actually got room service here.

He heard the machine-gun fire from thehelicopter, but it was difficult for the pilot to manoeuvre in such a tight space, even more difficult for the machine-gunner to take aim.

Or what we could do, well, what I mean is, maybe wouldn't do any harm going down to the pub tonight to see if theothers are there, only a quick drink mind, we can't be sure what they're like yet -'

Or what we could do, well, what I mean is, maybe wouldn't do any harm going down to the pub tonight to see if theothers are there, only a quick drink mind, we can't be sure what they're like yet -'

Erm, okay, let's have a look briefly at the idea of a token economy.

Apart from pieces by Lawrence, he did not print further creative work which linked the primitive and the modern; he himself no longer reviewed anthropological books.

Hitler's confidence in early victory made a deep impression, and it was widely believed that the final push would begin in March or April.

It then makes sense to make the effort to improve the lighting.

A better solution is to split the take into twoshots, the first (pre-tilt) one being exposed normally, and the second(tilted) one being given the correction.

The same passion, pride and hurt is in theplaying and, illuminatingly, the purpose and intricate invention of theblues suddenly starts to take shape.

Erm still got power as a rate of doing work.

The student can, optionally, take a supplementary subject chosen from a range pertinent to Chemistry.

One assertion which has been made in support of student loans is that a student should be prepared to take a loan in respect of his or her enhanced earning capacity as a graduate.

For the future of course, we have now negotiated with Eurofighter a rather better arrangement, they're setting up a joint team, they're trying to do all the work in one place and they really are now making a lot of progress.

If you're flying, take a spare set of undies, a pair of shorts and a top with you in your hand luggage - they'll come in very handy if your suitcase goes on a trip around the world without you.

Having come this far, we had a vested interest in Ashmunein, and we resolutely climbed the largest of its mounds.

Then the voices fell away and the music took hold of the room.

Well at the moment with the the mining industryas it is, unless you've got had you've got or had a relative working atthe pit, the local, you haven't got the s chance of in.

Well at the moment with the the mining industryas it is, unless you've got had you've got or had a relative working atthe pit, the local, you haven't got the s chance of in.

And the dozy town went about its lethargic business, rarely taking much notice of the oh-so-ordinary little girl in her gingham skirts and plaits.

She considered taking a `normal' job, perhaps making use of her practical skills.

`It was nice just to do shopping and the other sister stuff - in the hours when I wasn't working.

She was able to give a good account of herself and was reasonably cheerful duringthe interview, except when she talked about her boyfriend and about thedistress she had caused her parents.

After a careful examination of all these factors, the Layfield Committee concluded: `a local income tax (LIT) on personal incomes, levied according to where people live, is the only serious candidate for a new source of local revenue that could give a substantial yield and at the same time maintain or enhance accountability' (Layfield 1976: 190 - 1).

His Lordship must need to give consent.

My son, who's in his teens, can't do long division, simply because he wasn't paying attention, presumably, at school, and he's always used a calculator since.

When we want to make a muscle contract the brainsends a nerve impulse through the spinal chord, into the peripheralnerves and out along those nerves to the muscle and each individualmuscle fibre has a single junction, a nerve muscle junction, where thenerve makes contact with the muscle, and that is the site at which the stimulus leads to muscle contraction.

When we want to make a muscle contract the brainsends a nerve impulse through the spinal chord, into the peripheralnerves and out along those nerves to the muscle and each individualmuscle fibre has a single junction, a nerve muscle junction, where thenerve makes contact with the muscle, and that is the site at which the stimulus leads to muscle contraction.

In Britain the defence of the country has been left for centuries to a Navy which did its work out of sight.

She had her hand on the door, but, before she could follow through her intention to slam it in his face, Naylor gave a mighty roar of utter outrage.

His rich guest merely made a sound, unable clearly to articulate a word with his mouth as wadded as a feather pillow.

I mean, we'd used other drugs and got a good hit and we just wanted to try smack to see what it was like.

They use four pumping stations and move their equipment around Whiteface Mountain to make maximum use of 60 snowmaking guns.

This would have been delivered on Saturday evening by Mr. Bishop of Woodfords, the Downton bakers, who also made a delivery on Tuesdays.

Similarly, although there is competition for the viewer this does not usually impact on the financial fortunes of either organization.

Freedom of the press in the context of emancipation from the controls of the state meant `the freedom to make a political choice…'.

It seeks to give fair coverage to all political viewpoints and to treat all views with a degree of respect not always found in other serious newspapers.

For one thing there are usually very many otherthings at an event which need to be organised and directed by the PROand a well briefed photographer can take at least one burden off the PRO's shoulders.

Sometimes a creative approach can give added interest to the pack.

In a separate development, British Aerospace and Thomson CSF of France confirmed they were considering making a joint offer for Ferranti.

The enthusiasm of staff and students in placeslike McMaster confirms that techniques like problem based and selfdirected learning can make medical education an enjoyable experience without loss of quality in the end product.

Neither the college's report nor Kay's and Smith's articles amount to anything like a valid review of clinicalecology - still less does the use in court, against the college's wishes, of a draft report that was subsequently withdrawn as being unsatisfactory.

So how can you view the fact that somebody else is er, typing, or doing a transcript of er, what we're actually saying on thistape, we should explain what grotting is, it's most probably you knowsomething that you do on a computer screen rather than if you look it up in the dictionary, what grotting actually means.

So how can you view the fact that somebody else is er, typing, or doing a transcript of er, what we're actually saying on thistape, we should explain what grotting is, it's most probably you knowsomething that you do on a computer screen rather than if you look it up in the dictionary, what grotting actually means.

Although she could not afford to stay there, she certainly intended to give the impression that she was lodging under the same roof as the leaders of the Party.

In the eighteen months since Mrs Thatcher had taken up employment at Dickins and Jones, the mood of the Partyhad perceptibly changed for the better, the great bulk of the membership having transferred its loyalty smoothly from the old Leader to the new.

There was an intensified sense of a gap between present and past, and of the need to find a way of bridging it which would make possible an adequate statement of belief for the present day.

The issue of enforceability was given a poignant twist following passage of the Control of PollutionAct 1974 which made an inroad into the virtual monopoly of pollutioncontrol enjoyed by the water authorities.

That admission made her smile to herself.

A bash on the head with a golf-club'd make a nasty mess.'

It seemed unlikely that anyone so competent asDora would make such an elementary mistake, but under that fierce gazeMelissa felt bound to make some suggestion, however implausible.

It seemed unlikely that anyone so competent asDora would make such an elementary mistake, but under that fierce gazeMelissa felt bound to make some suggestion, however implausible.

He shook his head and made a movement with his hand, as if warding off some invisible threat.

`It's very good of you to include me,' she said when she, Iris and Jack were installed at a table, sipping apéritifs and making a show of studying the menu.

Dora stiffened and made no comment, but Rose reacted with enthusiasm.

He went to the supermarket to do some shopping for Juliette.

When the guard was told that no one had moved from their seats he became very worried because he said he had to make out a report to British Rail as to the cause of the delay and he then said, `I'll have to put it down to person or persons unknown'.

As James in La Sylphide, Hubbe gave a performance that rivalled memories of the very best in this part.

`Charmed to be making your acquaintance, dear lady.'

I'm a bit tired, to be honest; I'm going to get my head down for a while.

Lynne was doing all the hard work.

Ask me a question and engage me in conversation or make a statement that applies to me.

That it was not straightforward gave the deal an added excitement to Pink.

The wind was joggling a plastic tag attached to the handle of the golf bag and the sound made his scalp crawl.

`There's one thing doesn't make sense to me.

We're looking at how to plan inspections, get information from pupils and involve governors and parents better.

One of the disability lobby's persistent fears is that people will be pushed off the invalidity benefit into disabilityworking allowance if they can do some work.

The team ran two dummy inspections, testing the effectiveness of forms and learning how to get access to the information.

A plaque bearing the name of the adopter is displayed in the park and the adopter is given free entry to the park for a year.

See what see what you can do and perhaps er Janeyou could just look into the possibility of erm because if I mean if wewere going to do a run of pens we wouldn't just have a thousand would we?

See what see what you can do and perhaps er Janeyou could just look into the possibility of erm because if I mean if wewere going to do a run of pens we wouldn't just have a thousand would we?

Oh yes but but but what they're doing now is all the erm, they did the presentation to the manufacturing side,

Oh yes but but but what they're doing now is all the erm, they did the presentation to the manufacturing side,

If this happens the scab may bounce about with great speed and energy within the turret and may do as much damage as if the shell had actually penetrated.

I suppose I'll have to get another wedding ring.

My father just turned round I've had enough of it if Terry's not going to do the estimate he passes them on to Brian.

Your sick parent must be mentally fit to make this decision of her own free will, and it does not rob herof the right to make her own decisions as to the spending of her moneyor her free access to it.

Your sick parent must be mentally fit to make this decision of her own free will, and it does not rob herof the right to make her own decisions as to the spending of her moneyor her free access to it.

A proposal from Italy in the same month went further, to argue that OEEC should take the lead in the matter.

`If she acknowledges her fault,' said Yussuf, with the air of one making a great concession, `then I will take her back.'

`Don't you want me to give evidence?' she demanded.

Owen took no notice.

Officials see the main thrust as: more freedom in basic research to allow decision making by scientists rather thangovernment more encouragement for private enterprise to invest inresearch a push to persuade state research bodies to do more contract work for industry and rely less on government funds.

So how did Yukawa dare to make such a revolutionary proposal?

Such clauses have no effect on the primary liability to the third party for the death or personal injury he has suffered.

That kind of thing irked her, as did the difference in pay between women and men for doing practically the same work.

That kind of thing irked her, as did the difference in pay between women and men for doing practically the same work.

Mr Ueberroth got still less help from officialdom.

In America the rigmarole of getting a permit to develop a site can easily cost around $100,000, even before the expense of buying land.

So when UNITA arrived in Abidjan last month, fresh from victory at Huambo, it was determined to get a much better deal than the agreement in May 1991 which supposedly ended Angola's decade and a half of civil war.

Who did the shopping?

The Federal Communications Commission (FCC) originally made a tenfold gain over analogue a requirement.

When, in 1987, the EPA did a laborious review of the relative seriousness of America's environmental problems, it ranked old hazardous-waste sites below 30 others.

In making this request he is echoing the kind of analysis employed by the Curriculum Development Centre in Australia, where he was Director.

Remortgaging is the answer for people who do not want to move, but want to make a change in their finances.

`I just wanted to make some sense out of life.'

Each researcher must make a personal choice, in the multiplicity of circumstances which now exist.

There is literally no social arena - from thestrongest material relationship to the most subtle moral one - in whichthe possessing classes and a self-conscious proletariat could take one and the same position and figure as an undifferentiated whole.

The economic separation itself then did profound damage to the world payments and trade systems.

Finally, the new working class had no interest in a separate nation; their natural allies were the workers of Petrograd, Moscow and other cities of the empire.

Internationalism required that two thoroughly nationalistic and non-socialist movements be given complete support.

From her reclining position, Mrs Keith still took a controlling interest in the household, but with only Jim in the house and two farmhands in the hut, Tina had become used to being in charge.

Meantime the band had struck with Noreen's entry music and, taking a deep breath, she stepped out into the lights.

And the Aussies cheered, daring the policemen to make a move.

Hardly a word out of her, even when the curate, Father Mooney, insisted on making a speech to the company, and him hardly knowing Den at all.

Robert Fraser wanted to take up the invitation to visit my studio.

It all made sense, the relationship between non-Aristotelian logic and the banality of the American way of life: you had to take a detached view of the culture; you weren't in love with it and you didn't hate it.

Ever since the time of Jean-Jacques Rousseau there has been art whose aim has been the renewal of society, but it has had no effect beyond that of producing testimonials (even if controversial ones) of what we call the `real' world, in contrastperhaps with the unreal world of art.

Ever since the time of Jean-Jacques Rousseau there has been art whose aim has been the renewal of society, but it has had no effect beyond that of producing testimonials (even if controversial ones) of what we call the `real' world, in contrastperhaps with the unreal world of art.

Ever since the time of Jean-Jacques Rousseau there has been art whose aim has been the renewal of society, but it has had no effect beyond that of producing testimonials (even if controversial ones) of what we call the `real' world, in contrastperhaps with the unreal world of art.

Further, authorisation to give permission may well be outside their terms of reference.

Neurones are of three kinds: in sensory neurones the dendrites make contact with a sensory cell, such as a hair cell inthe ear or a light-sensitive cell in the retina; in motor neurones, theaxons make contact with a muscle fibre; finally, most neurones in thebrain make contact only with other neurones.

The blunt statement and Ulster accent made an immediate impact.

He ambled through to take a look at the machine.

Tomorrow he would have to make a visit to Penrith to get himself fixed up with somemore appropriate clothing for this unsympathetic and unreasonable patchof country.

Excuses not to do the work we think we might or should do, excuses not to be kind or considerate or whatever it is we feel we should be?

Er around this period we have the widespread use of things like colour television which has now started to appear in everybody's homes and the beginnings of variousholiday programmes.

A soft light gave away the outline of the door.

Besides, I didn't think I could now save enough to make a significant difference to my standard of living when I retired, so I decided I might as well enjoy it while I had the chance.

`When do your courses start?'

I had two additional problems: my age and getting a reference from someone.

There was a church just to the north of there that had a reputation for being helpful towards homeless people - I'd try my luck there.

If this bit does refer to you, open your eyes, take a look around you, see what's going on and do something.

Furthermore, as the gilded eagle seems poised for take-off to do battle with enemy hordes coming from the south-east,the memorial seems to have anticipated most aptly the events thatfollowed 17 years after its unveiling.

Tammuz sat and gnawed his knuckles as Roirbak made the call.

Sebastian Nocon got a huge key ring with the letter S on it from Fergie.

Mr Appleby said he complained to a senior officer who made a note in the ship's log.

Mr Lloyd said yesterday: `My duty is to get the management able to provide the most constructive and positive regime for prisoners and to secure the best value for money.

Liliana giving birth at such a late age has triggered controversy in Italy.

And she has failed to take action to limit the damage to her family's image each time scandal has threatened.

So they took a vote - and picked Bernard.

The reason I shall vote against the motion andfor the amendment couldn't have been put more succinctly than it was byMr , I think Mr made the most pertinent remark that has been made in the debate today, whenin opposition to what Mr said about individual freedom he said this is a matter of personal conscience.

The reason I shall vote against the motion andfor the amendment couldn't have been put more succinctly than it was byMr , I think Mr made the most pertinent remark that has been made in the debate today, whenin opposition to what Mr said about individual freedom he said this is a matter of personal conscience.

I must say that I am happy to make that statement and in view of some of the things that havebeen, that have appeared in the media recently here's a statement thatneeds to be made as for your your your ques , what the, the ChiefConstable I welcome the statement and the actions of the Chief Constable on this very concerning issue.

I must say that I am happy to make that statement and in view of some of the things that havebeen, that have appeared in the media recently here's a statement thatneeds to be made as for your your your ques , what the, the ChiefConstable I welcome the statement and the actions of the Chief Constable on this very concerning issue.

Feverfew, soapwort, chamomile, wallflower andclove pinks are some to plant in crevices and holes in the wall itselffirst putting in a little compost for the plant's roots to get a grip on.

Since the CTP is so flawed as an explanation of the mind and since its apparent attractions are apparent rather than real, how does the claim of that science to advance our understanding of the mind command such a following?

It's worth mentioning too, that during the year,er, Dr Tim , the general practitioner, who is seconded with er, SocialServices, has been doing work on hospital discharge, making sure that thearrangements are, are working, and his reports have been picked up bythe respective authorities, and, er, there has er, a sort of action plan has been put together, which is, which is intended to try to improvethe er, existing hospital discharge arr arrangement, making sure thatpeople are discharged from hospital and that the er, right type of careis available for them in, in the community.

Malcolm also made that contact when he and Bernie went on a trip up north,searching round textile factories for old fifties cloth to use formaking up zoot suits.

We went on to do a good matinée performance and came off to thunderous applause and whistles of appreciation.

Which is good news, I mean, from a client, they've got control over whether they keep you going or not.

George if you've got any food then we'll, we'll put it on or whatever is happening then, then then by the time I get something to eat

George if you've got any food then we'll, we'll put it on or whatever is happening then, then then by the time I get something to eat

As your business grows, so does the size of your payroll and the amount of time you or your staff have to spend calculating and paying wages, salaries and pensions.

`I wouldn't mind someone else here to make a mess,' Doris Smythe said wistfully.

But at least three, and maybe four of the women on the Tribune slate are also likely to be elected, taking the total of women on the Shadow Cabinet to four or five, compared with only one at present.

because they come into that age group, where somany people, you took a job when you were twenty o or or sixteen and you stayed with it for life, you didn't chop and change like people dothese days and the majority of our members erm we can go down and Iwould say the vast majority of our members have actually worked for thePost Office or starting with the Post Office and then B T or stayingwith the Post Office for forty years, there's no end of them they've got in there forty years service.

It would perhaps be better to concentrate on giving support for the newly elected socialist MPs, and trying to refound a clear sense of what socialism means today.

In the minds of those who gave positive thought to it, the Commonwealth was to be anorganization to which no one who was unwilling need apply, and in whichthose who had joined were to reach their decisions on the basis ofconsensus: the goal to be pursued was an uncoerced acknowledgement ofBritain as the senior partner in a world-wide enterprise; the positionto be sought was the supremely equivocal but potentially supremesatisfying one of primus inter pares .

He really wanted to do a play on maybe Broadway at the time - something different.'

For example, she may be required to take an assessment of her nursing skills for examination purposes during the allocation, and may need extra help for this purpose.

In many teaching establishments, a media resources officer is available to give advice on equipment, materials, maintenance of equipment and production of visual and audio aids.

In February he lectured on" The Music of Poetry" at Glasgow University and in April gave an address to the classical Association on" The Classic and the Man of Letters".

The combination of prophetic denunciation andbroad generalization did not appeal to his contemporaries; as one of his colleagues in the Chandos Group (where Eliot had been discussing thematters contained in his book) wrote later," It is understandable thatThe Idea of a Christian Society should make little appeal to the large majority of the intelligentsia.

He wrote in an essay published in 1937 that an artist must lead a" commonplace life" if he is properly to do his work.

They are people who visit, oversee, inspect, give medication and observe, but they are involved with patients only intermittently and are not present twenty-four hours in a day.

All services should address relatives' needs seriously by giving information, ensuring they feel involved and above all by ensuring that they are given the support they need to carry on caring.

All services should address relatives' needs seriously by giving information, ensuring they feel involved and above all by ensuring that they are given the support they need to carry on caring.

By providing Japan with the opportunity to save face and make an orderly withdrawal from drift-net fishing, the UN SecondCommittee bound them into a commitment to cease drift-net operations inthe near future - an astonishing achievement for a campaign which hadonly really gathered momentum 10 months earlier, with the sinking of the Sankichi Maru .

But he hated this prison and was always fighting to escape from Jekyll's mind and body, and take control.

(11) When you've finished your investigation and your notes on title are complete, it's useful at the foot of your notes to make a table of the major matters you must commonly consider, and mark them as satisfactory or otherwise.

To protect a buyer, it is best to advise making careful enquiry at the property: and include in one'srequisitions on title, specific enquiry (now a standard printedrequisition) as to whether any person other than the seller has anyinterest in the property.

Each reader could do a great deal of good by taking up this matter with his or her local MP or prospective candidate.

To take a memorable example, even after thrashing Wales 52-3, 10 tries to nil, in Christchurch last year they were thoroughly dissatisfied with themselves.

Every year or so since `76 found Thompson in some far-flung place, emerging from the fictional telephone box to do his Superman act and beat the world, or Europe or the Commonwealth, the great all-rounder, Victor Ludorum.

`Your ankle appears to have made a remarkable recovery,' he said caustically, switching the subject.

I've had to do all your work -'

In large-scale national surveys, as carried outregularly by market research firms and government agencies, interviewsmay be carried out over the whole country and the people who have thetask of making the analysis of several hundred or thousand schedulescannot possibly be for ever phoning through to the interviewers to askwhat some cryptic little scribble opposite question number 15 issupposed to mean.

I was recently given a Les Paul copy guitar, but unfortunately the electrics were faulty.

But I bumped into Chris who'd been doing some session work with Steve ( Buzzcocks ) Diggle, who was looking for a guitar player to do a few gigs, and Chris kind of trapped me into that.

But I bumped into Chris who'd been doing some session work with Steve ( Buzzcocks ) Diggle, who was looking for a guitar player to do a few gigs, and Chris kind of trapped me into that.

And for all his fans over here, I'd like to letthem know that he called DJ and me aside then and asked us if we'd beinterested in doing a European tour.

Just as Stencil's quest parodies the reader's desire to make sense of the text through interpretative patterning, so his investigation of other periods becomes a ludicrous enactment ofan author's creation of characters.

Alasdair Gray's Lanark gives evidence of the evolution of forms which may be the result.

a tennis-star; there is no sign of the husband;her lawyer tells her that the girl her son is marrying is her husband'smistress and that he had already taken over the apartment; she reflects a moment and decides to carry on with the reception, everything is allright, `if no one notices anything, it is as though nothing hashappened'; passers-by are invited to join the wedding-party, which theyhappily do because the tennis-star is present; the husband turns up inhis new car; no one takes any notice of him because no one knows who he is, exceptfor the dealer he sometimes does jobs for, who tells him all new carslose half their value as soon as they are bought and end up on thescrapheap anyway.

So often the push is in the opposite direction,to doing research which doesn't involve one in long-term contact withthe schools and this, of course, is one of the reasons why this type ofresearch isn't so often done, but I hope to do some more work in classrooms, yes.

So often the push is in the opposite direction,to doing research which doesn't involve one in long-term contact withthe schools and this, of course, is one of the reasons why this type ofresearch isn't so often done, but I hope to do some more work in classrooms, yes.

So often the push is in the opposite direction,to doing research which doesn't involve one in long-term contact withthe schools and this, of course, is one of the reasons why this type ofresearch isn't so often done, but I hope to do some more work in classrooms, yes.

So often the push is in the opposite direction,to doing research which doesn't involve one in long-term contact withthe schools and this, of course, is one of the reasons why this type ofresearch isn't so often done, but I hope to do some more work in classrooms, yes.

The problems encountered when making a 17 keV neutrino fit with what is known about the universe are the second reason for scepticism.

Heavy trading in New York before Brazil made its announcement smelt like insider trading.

The company claims that customers say that they want to do their development at the workgroup level in an open systemsenvironment, on a range of hardware and under different operatingsystems, and to share data in a decentralised development environment,rather than have it all tied to the Repository on the mainframe server.

`You stepped out of line asking Henley to do your work for you.

`But of course we'll know more when Professor Bearden has had a look.'

Miranda said quietly, `In that case, Adam, I'd like to get a second legal opinion.'

I mean, if you did contract it, wouldn't you want to know?'

He settled into a chair with a big sigh and took a sip, then blinked.

Pat Cash, out for eight months with an Achilles tendon injury, could make his comeback in the doubles at the Australian Open in Melbourne next month.

Franklin employ their own teacher sales team to give advice and support to schools starting to use their products.

For example, a firm with two partners would be getting 100 per cent attendance: a firm with eight only 20 per cent [sic].

The scheme offered the opportunity of doing extra magistrates work.

The student should look out for them and make a mental note of their fascinating and beautiful effect.

Thought by one of the judges to make a good radio play.

Even having made a commitment to the climb, the option of retreat is always open if you sense the temperature is too high or the snow conditions dangerous.

Why, then, did interest groups come into focus; what was this new theory; how adequately does this theory make sense of British politics; are there alternativeperspectives on the part played by interests and groups in Britishpolitics; and how adequate are those perspectives?

Why, then, did interest groups come into focus; what was this new theory; how adequately does this theory make sense of British politics; are there alternativeperspectives on the part played by interests and groups in Britishpolitics; and how adequate are those perspectives?

For if a garage habitually does half the service its costs are very much lower than if it has done the full service; and since it can charge the full price,because of the ignorance of the consumer, its pro fits are maximisedwhen it does as little of the service as it can get away with.

For if a garage habitually does half the service its costs are very much lower than if it has done the full service; and since it can charge the full price,because of the ignorance of the consumer, its pro fits are maximisedwhen it does as little of the service as it can get away with.

Britain, sheltered by the sea and the strength of her navy from the necessity of having a good diplomatic organization, never attempted to compete with the great continental States in this respect.

He glanced nervously at his watch and made a hasty decision.

So let's start by taking a look at what's what in floorcoverings.

She did not believe that she could bring Scathach back to life, but he could at least be with her in the fortress as she made her journey into the first forest, as she went in search of whatever it was that had ensnared Harry, made him a prisoner in Old Forbidden Place.

But Mr Kohl's lack of forthrightness in acting against racist attacks and his reluctance to take up the cause of their victims suggests a chancellor, if not a country, who has yet to come fully to terms with the past.

The proposed shoe factory, for example, would make a return on capital of around 15% if it sold running shoes for 1,000 roubles a pair.

He had not wanted to have to trouble himself making conversation.

How his mother had made her pay!

We can talk this through, make some sense out of it.'

Imagine old George getting a phone call from a friend.

Although, understanding the way, volumemanufacture and I would say they've probably if they've got similarproduction facilities, got a very good chance of producing good stuff anyway.

Although, understanding the way, volumemanufacture and I would say they've probably if they've got similarproduction facilities, got a very good chance of producing good stuff anyway.

This suggestion certainly seems to make sense when put into the context of the story of the massacre of the innocents.

While there is no way of knowing whether theserates of erosion are typical or atypical of Andean regions in general,the data nevertheless give cause for concern and emphasise the role of soil erosion as a major agent of environmental change.

I mean with something like British Gas erm to make the enormous profit they've made surely it must be possible to reduce the price to the consumer.

I mean with something like British Gas erm to make the enormous profit they've made surely it must be possible to reduce the price to the consumer.

Cos language does change doesn't it?

Cos language does change doesn't it?

Especially when you're making a break, so having made the .

They usually incorporate internal steel membersfor extra strength, and because of the relatively large cross-section of the various stiles and rails they can make an appropriate replacement for many older-style houses with timber windows.

The next time you call at your local council offices to collect some forms for making a Building Regulations application, don't be surprised if you are asked, `What type of forms do you want - Full plans or Building Notice?'

The Indonesians wanted to start within a month,but Douglas-Hamilton and Child urged them to consider delaying it sothat the army could do a pilot run and the local people could be better informed about what to expect.

In this country we discovered the value of prevention and rehabilitation in the 1950s and 1960s and our belief inpermanence achieved through working with a child in his own family was given legal sanction in Section 1 of the 1963 Act.

Hence, an illusion that the children would sooner or later return home was sustained, mitigating the need to plan foranother outcome which, in any case, was considered inferior and likelyto do as much harm as good.

The concept that social intervention could haveeffects unintended by the practitioners, and which could be revealedonly by asking the clients for their subjective impressions, took a long time to achieve currency, and had to do battle with the time-honoured attitude inprofessional practice that the client could not be expected to know what he, or more usually she, wanted.

and get all your commission paid in direct in to your bank that Friday.

Reason has a role, but only when doing the work of faith.

Wherever the pub is, whether it's in the docks or the full of the town, that doesn't make much difference.

I am not going out of my mind, she thought, andif, at the moment, the outside world does not recognise me for what Iam, my sister knows she has only to speak a word here and there, to take a decision, and who will listen to me?

Now, if you, if a woman gets hurt and she goes to the police for help they come to the house and they tell the people concerned it's a domestic argument!

How was he going to make this phone call?

Or perhaps they didn't actually do any work at all.

Or perhaps they didn't actually do any work at all.

It was wonderful to feel again, to let herself go with it, to water-ski blindfold, to jump out of a plane and take a chance on the ripcord.

I don't want to make hasty and furtive love with you.

They had come to the hotel to make love.

We should not want to go slower than 1/200thsecond because of camera movement and, for a bright day, f8 at 1/200thwith ASA 200 rated film will give a result.

George Herbert took up this image by saying that God's `silk twist' links earth to heaven.

Harry is supposed to be coming home to take up his inheritance of the family estate, but the emotional pressures of his family force him to escape instead to become a medical missionary.

Sharing in such a personal faith gives unity to the diversity of human beings, bringing us together with others.

Maud made a swatting gesture against his amusement.

All the same, he insisted on doing a final tour.

The industry is trying to be seen to be more responsible, take a longer-term view and structure transactions more prudently.

S1 makes a management charge covering a variety of commonly incurredexpenditure (including his services) to S2: however, no analysis of this recharge is available.

And now Scottish Natural Heritage has asked theInstitute of Terrestrial Ecology, Banchory, in liaison with the Scottish Agricultural Statistics Service and Biosphere Consultancies, to do a study to determine the current status of adders in Scotland.

This has led to farmers overstocking animals on the land which has had a devastating effect on birdlife.

This has led to farmers overstocking animals on the land which has had a devastating effect on birdlife.

She had described the dress to them, haltingly, trying to make her account amusing, searching desperately for a tone that would make its existence plain and casual and innocent to them, but she had not quite attained it;" My cousin Mavis," she had said, laughing.

She had described the dress to them, haltingly, trying to make her account amusing, searching desperately for a tone that would make its existence plain and casual and innocent to them, but she had not quite attained it;" My cousin Mavis," she had said, laughing.

Just telephone the nearest Cosmos office to make a holiday booking for any UK departure point.

The medium is particularly well suited to close-up shots and the viewer can make his assessment of the situation from behind the player's arm.

The SFA listed categories test includes advisoryclients and clients for whom the firm acts, in addition tocounterparties; it excludes many more clients or counterparties frombeing customers than does the SIB transactional test and is thus very helpful.

The clearer the disclosure and the descriptiongiven of the effect of the loss of protections, the more likely it isthat SFA would regard the customer as having sufficient understanding to qualify; and (3) The customer must normally give consent in writing after getting a proper opportunity to consider the warning.

The latest work, Phosphor, is an exploration of the relationship `between the human eye and its ability to make sense of colour, shape and light.'

Believing that an artist has to suffer to make his statement, he puts himself through dangerous sequences like cutting off his breathing.

MAFF TO TAKE NO FURTHER ACTION AGAINST CASEOUS LYMPHADENITIS

The Ministry therefore feel that they can do nothing to restrict its spread, and will take no further action.

Trace Computers Plc blames the fall in turnoverfor the six months to November 30 (figures, see page five), on a planned reduction in the scale of its computer supplies business, where turnover fell by nearly £1m; the company managed to shave £122,000 from its administrative and operating costs; the original businesses ofinsurance broking systems, property management systems and bespokesoftware development have continued to prosper, the company says, and the Proteus distribution systems business, consolidated on its return to profits last year; Trace Financial also made a small profit and there was interest in the Blue Chip stock broking product; the group is still investing about £2m a year inresearch and development - with some contribution from its customers;the Pink networking technology company had a disappointing half year,turning in a small loss after having made a profit last year.

Trace Computers Plc blames the fall in turnoverfor the six months to November 30 (figures, see page five), on a planned reduction in the scale of its computer supplies business, where turnover fell by nearly £1m; the company managed to shave £122,000 from its administrative and operating costs; the original businesses ofinsurance broking systems, property management systems and bespokesoftware development have continued to prosper, the company says, and the Proteus distribution systems business, consolidated on its return to profits last year; Trace Financial also made a small profit and there was interest in the Blue Chip stock broking product; the group is still investing about £2m a year inresearch and development - with some contribution from its customers;the Pink networking technology company had a disappointing half year,turning in a small loss after having made a profit last year.

She's always been quite mature because she's an only child and she's got a good head on her shoulders.'

DEC also said it would provide R4000-based daughter cards to upgrade existing R3000 DECstations and DECsystems, but would give no indication as to whether it would proceed with MIPS beyond the R4000, or concentrate on Alpha.

This immediately excludes from the scope of the Protocol the whole area of taking evidence and obtaining information abroad; this areacould be excluded by Reservation from the scope of the Convention, andis also the object of a distinct Inter-American Convention.

Customs and Excise Commissioners , Lord DenningM.R. expressed the view that it would be `intolerable if an innocentperson - without any interest in a case - were to be subjected to anaction… simply to get papers or information out of him.

Having made the somewhat contentious statement on Caribbean parents' distorted appreciationof their function in relation to their children's formal education, I am left to qualify and substantiate, particularly as it has a weightybearing on the general argument of the entire book.

`Gentleman Jim' had previously retired from the ring rather than do combat with a black man, but was tempted in an effort to curb the mounting confidence of blacks and re-establish whitedominance in the sport.

When the controller of a space rocket said recently that the team were going to decide what to do next, he expressed the thought as, `We will evaluate the situation in order to make a determination.'

N.B. Whatever happens, the one virtual certainty is that people already in their mid-fifties have no cause for concern and would not have to postpone their retirement!

Before deciding on a particular course, it is worthwhile giving a little thought to the best time to go and the subjects which the counselling should cover.

It is not an offence under the Theft Act to take information.

According to Willie van Peer's introductory statement, the book is intended to promote a reconciliation betweenliterary and linguistic approaches to the study of literature, and, more specifically, to provide a much-needed contribution in threefundamental directions: first, the development of a theory of textuality which accounts both for the way in which all texts function in societyand for the differences between literary and non-literary texts; secondly, the construction of a model of literary communication that gives an adequate account of the complexities involved in the production and reception of literary texts; and thirdly, the development of more explicit and comprehensive accounts of the ways in which formal and contextual factors interact in the process of deriving interpretations from texts.

Thus, in both pairs of cases we have the result that as discount rates shrink, so does the sequential equilibrium strategy approach the dominant strategy type's play.

Each of the 96 subjects did the experiment twice, giving a grand total of 192 repetitions of the experiment.

Don't try to remove anything before it is ready as it will only go wrong in the long run, making all your work so far a complete waste of effort.

To make the top rectangular picture, I used a card mount in palest pink, behind which I stretched some cream silk.

I use this basic method of building up the design on a bed of leaves, as it gives a good three-dimensional effect, but there are several other ways to achieve an equally pleasing design.

Essentially, active involvement in a meeting reverses the characteristics of the disease, giving a sense of peace, hope, trust, love and other positive senses.

However, care should be taken not to use a professional counsellor as a" fixer" who enables one to avoid doing any real work of one's own.

Because they hadn't done any management, Debbie felt Landlords were entitled only tothe 10 per cent tenant-finding fee and therefore owed her £2,400 (3months' rent plus the deposit).

THERE is no need for Mr Smith to impose taxes on capital or on financial institutions though: his policies look set to do their damage by knocking the most valuable asset owned by most voters - their homes.

to make a tremulous bridge for love.

Thirdly, social movements are organised aroundspecific demands such as the need to defend the legality ofland-holdings; the desire to get access to water and electricity; or the need to protect human rights.

Most important of all, try to get as much information as you can about each of the universities youare considering, in order that you may make the most sensible choice tosuit your own needs.

IBM Corp joined with Phoenix Technologies Ltd tolicense the IBM personal computer BIOS: the program enables OEMcustomers to access IBM's SurePath PC Standard specification forsoftware compatibility interfaces, and through Phoenix, they will also get access to IBM's Architecture Review Board to extendthe SurePath PC standard specification for new technologies andfeatures, the partners said.

Consultants told the paper that IBM has beendissecting the two most recent pre-release versions of NT at its Toronto labs to assess the time and money that would be required to do the implementation, and reckon a product could arrive at the turn of the year.

If you feel that your award is wrong in some way you can ask for the decision to be reviewed or make an appeal - details of how to do this are available from social security benefit offices.

Sanger's Circus arrived to give a command performance for the estate workers, and an elephant escaped and demolished the station gates.

Whilst coping with immediate problems, it was important to take the long-term view.

He'd call it doing research.

`A good teacher is someone who'll take a good joke but will make us work to get the work done.

`I do fear for you.'

Nevertheless, it seems highly probable that thepersisting biochemical abnormalities (phenylalanine excess or someclosely related change) at least make a substantial contribution to the neurological impairment.

An Assured Shorthold Tenant may make an application to a Rent Assessment Committee for adetermination of the rent which in the opinion of the Committee thelandlord might reasonably be expected to obtain for the property.

There was so much to tell, and she didn't know how to explain the tangle in a way which made sense.

It is interesting to make the obvious observation that, while the first and last named arefanatical behaviourists, believing that everything is subject tounlimited moulding and rearrangement through a process of reward andpunishment, the three in the middle are fanatical instinctivists,insisting that virtually everything and anything is inherited, a gift(or a grief) of the genes and not subject to the environment.

Any realistic attempt to improve prison conditions must take full account of two pivotal aspects of the prison system, namely population and capacity.

Those critics of the police who argue that they took a partisan position can at least point to legal authority that would have justified a different approach.

It would be obviously undesirable that such matters should be made the subject of evidence in a Court of law or otherwise discussed in public.'

Police determination to control the volume and the effect of picketing made movement around the country and demonstrations at collieries extremely difficult; `much secondary picketing was preventedfrom taking place, effectively or at all, by police action rather thanthe intervention of the civil courts, and it is this factor that is atthe heart of complaints that the police broke the strike, or were usedto break it' (Wallington, 1985: 148).

The practice of `practical criticism' in factunconsciously takes it for granted that the readers already know enoughabout poetry to have a grasp of rules and conventions sufficient to make adequate sense of the passage.

As we have seen, there may be cultural barriersto such reading, but leaving aside that potential difficulty, we invitethe student to make a unique, personal response to the text, to tune in to the true voice offeeling, to participate in its expressiveness; in short, to have anaesthetic experience.

By mid-way through the four-day London OriginalPrint fair (the eighth) a number of dealers were reporting someencouraging results, and by the close of the event every participant had made a sale.

The one who would go round to all the different clubs and people's houses and do the cooking there.

Cora-Beth gave a rueful smile.

The Amoco Corporation, owner of the Amoco Cadiztanker which caused one of the worst oil spills in history when it ranaground off the French coast in 1978, has agreed to make a further payment relating to the accident.

This is firmly in the long-standing tradition which sees someone getting credit - and notably credit carrying interest - as needing special protection.

Compared with these other fields of intervention, the state itself rarely took the lead in the area of sexuality.

To take the former example, a phobia can occur as a result of a severeemotional shock, possibly experienced in childhood, the severity ofwhich has caused the subject to bury his recollection of it in hissubconscious mind - it being too traumatic to cope with at a consciouslevel.

`If Bernard gets away after tipping off Bailey he's certain to be given a new identity by the CIA.

You made marriage the price of your body?

Some computers have room in the instruction to specify a third accumulator to hold the result, giving the effect of a three-address instruction restricted to the accumulator array.

In such circumstances Wakefield, like others well-placed, could direct royal patronage in the Church towards himself without doing much in return: the treasurership of St Paul's Cathedral(1369-75), the archdeaconry of Northampton (1371-2), the prestigiousarchdeaconry of Canterbury (1374-5), and much else.

But we haven't done a march ninety one then.

They complain they don't get any information.

First, that making a conceptual distinction in this way between `university' and `higher education' is to engage in philosophical pedantry.

Occasionally, a student - perhaps in mathematics or logic - can be seen actually to make a contribution to the research literature, but that is so rare as to appear precocious.

The individual teacher may well have made a significant development in his or her own understanding, but that is not a sufficient condition of securing publication (thesis three).

Put this analogy into the teaching situation,where the argument often runs that the teacher in higher education should not just be doing research, but that that research should be brought into the curriculum.

She done the performance on her own better than she did at the erm

Wilson made good use of what he had learned about publicity from his relationship with Plimsoll.

Generally, however, it was the policy of the union to appoint" delegates" from Sunderland or elsewhere to do this initial work.

Erm, well it's just a seminar about planning atthe moment, I shall get further information about it on nearer the time, erm, a change in who would pay our, or get our VAT repayment claim from, doesn't change an address basically, and er a request from Sam Stewart, whose erm a Counc , er a CountyCouncillor, er something which I really can't actually erm help himwith, he wants to know the whole of our Parish Council meetings date for nineteen ninety four, but I mean this is something we fix as we goalong, so I really don't think that I can help him by that, and I'msending him that, erm

Erm, well it's just a seminar about planning atthe moment, I shall get further information about it on nearer the time, erm, a change in who would pay our, or get our VAT repayment claim from, doesn't change an address basically, and er a request from Sam Stewart, whose erm a Counc , er a CountyCouncillor, er something which I really can't actually erm help himwith, he wants to know the whole of our Parish Council meetings date for nineteen ninety four, but I mean this is something we fix as we goalong, so I really don't think that I can help him by that, and I'msending him that, erm

A majority of Gujerati women, particularly those from East Africa, do work or look for work outside the home.

But how can you have a good time when you keepbeing reminded about `the gulf between people who have stuff and thepeople who have shit', or that `the world doesn't make sense [to me] any more'?

Another place of worship was built in 1828 forthe Methodists but as attendances dwindled in the 1970s it was decidedto share with Christ church, a facility which made economic sense.

This would not have pleased the old 19th century residents who took care to have the information `of South Newbald' or `of North Newbald' recorded on their tombstones.

Cardiff, whose rucking and mauling remains sub-standard, at least possess a pair of half-backs with the wit and ability to make best use of the ball they do get.

One of them had been Keith Sutton, taking a break from editing the anti-Murdoch strike paper, the Wapping Post , in the office below.

Sutton had taken great care over his written application for the editorship; even his later detractors say it was brilliant.

Lowe, who loves playing with figures, did some research and estimated sales could reach as many as400,000 - more than the FT where he worked, and a respectable figure atthe quality end of Fleet Street.

So we talk of five hundred redundancies is totally wrong and I think erm in the circumstances calculated to give the wrong impression I hope I will urge that you do not accept the resolution and that we accept in .

Roger Smith, a research chemist, made an evaluation of the literature guides in chemistry, and this probably represents the wider attitude of academic staff:

Again, an extra quango wouldn't be needed and erhe's probably aware of that there is a develo er there is a group of erof er various regulators who erm who operate under the acronym finn F Idouble N N and which is referred to er in the fact that I think thechancellor made some announcement about it.

Obviously we do not want to be in two minds up to the last day and he wouldn't do that but there is quite a a period ofdiscretion where the time gets shorter and er he would have to make a judgement.

We make sure and many of our tenants, of course,are in receipt of housing benefit, those on the lowest incomes, and forthem housing benefit will meet most, if not all, of the increase, butthere are many tenants who don't get housing benefit who will have to pay the increase themselves.

Well, all right, Frankie, I'd just like to get Tony's view on this.

Housing benefit is very, very difficult to geterm and again it's paid in arrears, and landlords won't wait for that,so you can't get accommodation erm and you just sort of go down and down with discouragement really.

We've got a typical example of that at the moment.

I didn't make the decisionWe welcome people from every party, it doesn'treally matter which party, or even if they belong to no party, who arejust committed to seeing a representative representation, seeing morewomen in there, because women in this country, just as a matter of fact, have a rather different experience from most men, and if you're making a decision then you want there the people who have had a wide range of experience, who can bring that experience to bear on

I didn't make the decisionWe welcome people from every party, it doesn'treally matter which party, or even if they belong to no party, who arejust committed to seeing a representative representation, seeing morewomen in there, because women in this country, just as a matter of fact, have a rather different experience from most men, and if you're making a decision then you want there the people who have had a wide range of experience, who can bring that experience to bear on

I suppose well my children would say my answer to everything is to say to them breathe, you know, and erm you know just do very simple relaxation if nothing else, and then that allows youmaybe to start looking at other things, but to get to the state whereyou can begin to look at things without the fears and emotions gettingin the way.

erm I think it's really encouraged by the factthat the erm gipsy sites which one sees around the County at the present moment because there is very little control over them, are mostunsightly and do considerable damage to the countryside, and people do not wish this to happen in their own area.

erm I think it's really encouraged by the factthat the erm gipsy sites which one sees around the County at the present moment because there is very little control over them, are mostunsightly and do considerable damage to the countryside, and people do not wish this to happen in their own area.

but you've got to have a three thousand mileservice, and as the gentleman said erm I recorded the deliveries andsent them all back and on the third one, when I took it in I asked ifthey'd put a new set of points in for me and erm unfortunately when itcame out there was no compression at all and because because I it wassuggested that I dug my heels in a bit and got an independent report and erm basically they told me to get lost because it cost fifty pound to do the report.

I mean if it were the case that we got on the way to establishing an appropriate atmosphere in the colleges, one wherewomen felt comfortable and where they felt they could get the most fromtheir educational experience, I think that would have profound impact on people's later lives.

Modelling at Adorno's would be steady work; it would pay well and, even after the agency took its cut, she'd have money left over.

`It is a command of idioms that makes the difference.

Come here, cara , and let me get a closer look.'

He went to the starboard side of the boat and took hold of a broad plank, heaving at it while the Captain remained still and silent, watching.

People were squeezing towards the raised pit to get a better look at the fighting cocks.

You will need to get a receipt for the materials if you do the work yourself or the bill from the contractor if you have the work done for you.

For example, if a cell doubles its discharge rate under one set of conditions but quadruples under another, does that difference affect how subsequent levels in the circuit respond so that one group of cells is excited by the first set ofconditions but a second group is activated by the second set?

Where illness leads to loss of sight, speech or hearing it diminishes an individual's ability to make use of counselling assistance.

The sensor measures alkalinity and when the level falls below a pre-set value it activates a pump that delivers productfrom a bulk container to the tank in sufficient quantity to make up solution to the desired strength.

Put another way, the more the teacher is explicit about what behaviour is wanted, the less opportunity the pupils have to come to it for themselves and make the underlying knowledge or understanding their own.

Especially in maths I couldn't stand the competitiveness of seeing the `clever boy' (there's always one in every class!) do the exercises miles before everyone else and understanding things quicker than everybody which just reinforced the idea that I didn't have a `mathematical brain'.

Especially in maths I couldn't stand the competitiveness of seeing the `clever boy' (there's always one in every class!) do the exercises miles before everyone else and understanding things quicker than everybody which just reinforced the idea that I didn't have a `mathematical brain'.

Both discussion and the way that activities were tackled gave some indication of children's understanding of the ideas.

We don't but we, we do tape.

We don't but we, we do tape.

It didn't take much anaesthetic to render the exhausted patient unconscious, and, as Sophie made the first incision, she put aside her dislike of being critically watched by her professional rival and concentrated on her life-saving task.

`I only charged them fifty pence so we won't get rich on that, but it's probably done our reputation a lot of good.'

Trying not to show that she was completely at a loss, Sophie made a careful examination, then, taking out her stethoscope, shegestured to the herdsman to hold the calf steady while she listened toher patient's lungs.

It was then that she realised her own power and made an instant resolve never to abuse it.

Joanna's depression vanished immediately and she set off to do the shopping in high spirits while Sophie, equally elated, went to the surgery.

They don't do any harm.'

They don't do any harm.'

You have to force yourself to make adequate eye contact with the audience and to stand still.

The first is, at intervals in the conversation, to give a summary of the salient points as you have understood them.

At the end of the first session the therapist will try to pull all the information together and make sense out of what has been said, feeding back to the client some explanation and treatment plan.

It's easy to be deceived into thinking none of it makes any sense but it does make sense: a strange, twisted, whimsical, surreal kind of sense.

The venture will provide analysis of existing deposits and do interpretation of data from potential new fields.

`Why didn't you move?'

`General, take a look at this.'

He said in a grave tone that would have done credit to the S.M.O., `So she is still having to stay in her bedroom?

Jessamy puffed her way to the end of the track, then stood still, partly because she needed to get her breath back and partly because she was startled by the sight in front of her.

It was only when she moved in that she discovered the coincidence, and did some research with the British Museum.

The year's resurgence of interest in travesties of middle-aged women, all ugly, strident and terminally randy, boucing around alongside girls in doublets and hose or whatever, intent on making respectful love to sugary heroines in lacy crinolines, has always seemed to me extraordinary.

It became urgently necessary on Christmas Eve afternoon to get a comforting present sent from London to a sad lady in Wordsley near Wolverhampton.

The reporter was ungentlemanly enough not only to do the calculation and obtain the correct answer but also to print it in the society column.

The extended partnership of business, local education service, university and polytechnic, in Sheffield has taken ownership of the Sheffield Record of Experience and Achievement.

There are clear `fits' between the two lists, giving support to the view that a synergetic relationship ispossible, and some obvious benefits are almost bound to derive frombringing two organisations together, just as sitting next to Nellietraditionally gradually fused the experience of the expert with theyouthful vigour of the apprentice.

The answer to financial worries is to get a sponsor, but they are very few and far between as a glance down the players' attachments will show you.

It said Elizabeth Tamposi, already fired by President Bush, and her officials in the State Department's consular affairs bureau took the action in `partisan hopes of derailing the Clinton campaign.'

Amongst smaller introduced animals are fire ants, which out-compete with the native ants (and which can causeuncomfortable nights for camping scientists); and cockroaches, whichhave been discovered on one or two islands and may have been transported inadvertently amongst supplies destined for scientists doing long-term research.

You will be called to give evidence of having discovered the body.'

`I wondered if there were any external pressures that led your husband to make the change.'

Like phonemes themselves, words only have significance in relation to other words and as part of a total system of classification.

Thucydides wanted to give a wholly reliable account of the wars between Athens and Sparta; and this meant that unverified assumptions about the past had to be excluded.'

Robin Horton, in a widely cited article on African systems of thought (1967), likewise attempted to break down the elements of scientific thinking in order to demonstrate that so-called `primitive' peoples such as the Azande did in fact make use of the same elements of thought, although applied to different content.

Well, that would make an enormous difference.

I've always made a point of borrowing money from women early in the relationship so as to give them a hold over me.

Only with incredible luck, against all the odds, could he reasonably hope to make a safe exit from Russian soil and reach safe ground from which the Americans might be able to extricate him in one piece.

It is all very costly and there is sometimes a limited choice of what is available for your client to sponsor that makes economic sense and will attract media and consumer attention.

Once you've decided on the type (and design, if relevant), make a note of the tile and pack size so you can work out how many to buy.

Stories were told about how they had actually done considerable damage to some visiting fans when situations had got out of hand.

Now do the above exercise with the tuck controls instead of the slip controls.

Have you got ne have you got a new suit?

Do you wanna make a move madam?

Alex Mair said easily: `Why didn't you ring?

There was an open roll-top desk facing one of the wide windows and, to its right, a stable door, the top half open, gave a view of the paved courtyard.

During the succession crisis of 1553, Edward's Roman Catholic sister Mary studiously declined to make any public statement about the possibility of a restoration of papal authority in England.

If you refuse to come and help me out with this, you might miss getting your end away.

So all in all, since most of the passage is toldfrom Pemberton's point of view, we are led in the absence of contraryevidence into taking the whole passage in that light.

He offers the following among paraphrases of" After dinner, the senator made a speech": [1] When dinner was over, the senator made a speech [2] A speech was made by the senator after dinner.

He offers the following among paraphrases of" After dinner, the senator made a speech": [1] When dinner was over, the senator made a speech [2] A speech was made by the senator after dinner.

He offers the following among paraphrases of" After dinner, the senator made a speech": [1] When dinner was over, the senator made a speech [2] A speech was made by the senator after dinner.

Metaphor denies us a literal sense, and so induces us to make sense, ie to find interpretations beyond the truth-functional meaning captured by paraphrase.

Rosemary gave no sign.

Applied to non-fictional language, this position fails to make an important discrimination.

The Professor, he tells us, was some time in making his appearance, but suddenly the noise and bustle of conversation were stopped by his entrance.

Croaking it As my article `Legal Highs' (FACE 49) was so subjective, I knew somebody was going to take issue with it.

There has been much discussion of the need toincrease the speed at which new products are brought to the marketplaceand a `rugby team' in contrast to a `relay' approach to projectmanagement has been suggested as a way of making faster progress (Takeuchi and Nonaka, 1986).

Essential to anyone with a lawn, this is the single largest investment most gardeners make in equipment.

The best type for a luxury lawn, these cut with a scissor action to give a good finish.

2.45:BY far and away the most competitive juvenile race run so far this term, and I fancy in-form Flat handicapper ROBINGO to make a winning debut over hurdles for Martin Pipe.

The story goes that when Nicholl was explaining a new tactical formation to Cherednik, Gotsmanov had the whole squadrolling around by interrupting: `What time does the coach leave.'

THE Sports Council may cut the British Amateur Weightlifters' Association's £170,000 grant for taking no action against Andrew Davies and Andrew Saxton.

Platt made a flying visit to Birmingham yesterday to announce a newsponsorship deal with Brymon European Airways before re-turning to Italy for a Juventus friendly tonight.

OLDHAM made a loss of more than £500,000 last season - their first back in the top flight for more than 60 years.

Sometimes I will have abandoned a painting, got really tired of it and feel it's not getting anywhere, and you will come and make some remark that makes me look at it again and think: oh yes, I could just pull that one together.

Sometimes I will have abandoned a painting, got really tired of it and feel it's not getting anywhere, and you will come and make some remark that makes me look at it again and think: oh yes, I could just pull that one together.

The fact that they have been asked to continue until the next World Cup makes good common sense and I hope it is a sign that at long last someone at the top is finally making the right decisions.

But in fact they did care, because if they hadn't the traumas that afflicted Welsh rugby at about this time would have had not effect.

No need to be stationary when making a mark.

Irish teams do tour well and it is certain that the new assistant coach Gerry Murphy will improve the quality of Ireland's back play.

The Second World War was different from theprevious wars in that the Soviets as the occupying power, were imposingtheir ideology on the people they had taken control of in Eastern Europe.

And Lady Paignton, whom you met yesterday, is always saying she wished she had somebody to do shopping for her.

They also took their campaign onto the national stage through their participation in the Anti-Nuclear Power Show at the Carnsore Point site.

I I I'd say with the, with the revamped exam you're not likely, you're not likely to get a question like that.

By the way erm it's always rather amusing when you see in the old history books the er the idea that erm that, to give an example, somebody like Metternich.

So well known were the acquisitive instincts ofRoger-Bernard III, count of Foix, by 1300 that the treason charges madeby Philip the Fair's proctors against Bernard Saisset, bishop ofPamiers, included allegations that Saisset had promised to make Foix lord of the comté of Toulouse in 1295-7, so that his power would then be feared from Bordeaux to the Pyrenees.

Looking after three young children, being involved in various groups as well as doing part-time evening work means that Faith depends on food that's quick and convenient to prepare.

The first section is programmed to give an output at 1.2MHz and the second to produce 12.5kHz or 15kHz output to the phase detectors, a wide choice of frequency inputthereby being possible.

National Semiconductor made a brave attempt with its LM32900, and the take-over of Fairchild saw the demise of the FSP100.

Ali Idrissi Kaitouni was given a 15-year sentence for writing poems about social injustice andpolitical oppression in Morocco, deemed by the state to constitute acrime against internal security.

If all those [computer] models do work, it will give us a lot more confidence working on all those other problems,' ( Science News , 21 August 1982, p 121).

Mr Clarke's reaction reveals the same double standard as did his reaction to the doctors' equally democratic verdict which he proceeded to dismiss.

Like pasta, it is what you put on it that makes the difference.

You might like to count your way through out loud, some people like to sing and, if you do have a full-length mirror you can exercise in front of, then watch yourself.

Four tries went to flanker Mike Budd , making an impressive return to action after prolonged injury problems.

In an interview after the game he said, `In La Rochelle we never start a game with the intention of doing harm.

One suburban Anglican church in Surrey, England discovered on doing this exercise that they had to gain on average thirty-fournew members each year just to stay where they were in terms ofmembership, such was the high level of mobility in their community.

The importance of the level of expertise for professional power has led some writers to make a distinction between professions and semi-professions, with doctors and lawyers in the former category but social workers andteachers in the latter.

It did a particularly good job of informing people about the issues - especially if they were tabloid press readers, who could get relatively little information from the press; and it made electors feel more warmth and commitment to the party system and party leaders generally.

Leigh is sitting in the sunshine in Spain, taking a break from filming a new series of his BBC TV drama Kinsey, which goes out next month.

And `what did my daddy look like?'

`I did work with photographer Helmut Newton but there were no whips involved.

Would In Bed With Madonna get your vote for Film of the Year or should it go to Die Hard 2, Ghost or Robin Hood: Prince Of Thieves?

They were kept waiting for four hours before being given clearance to cover the Match of The Century (starring Paul Gascoigne).

An angry spokeswoman for Edwardian Hotels said the group was not prepared to make any comment on BCCI.

They were excellent in every aspect and always more than willing to give positive practical advice to allow hotel managers to conduct their business with the backing of a truly professional team.

This is seen as an important means of getting away from the elitist concept and encouraging everyone to take a longer view, even if his or her immediate task involves short-term objectives.

We made two hundred and forty five pounds on Thriller of the Year one hundred and nineteen pounds on Tea for Two but that is after we've made the three hundred pounds donation to Whiston Hospital we made a thousand and eighteen pounds on the panto Wuthering Heights we lost four hundred and nine pounds, but that was basically that we do costume plays and have to hire the erm fixtures and set pieces from Wrightsons or wherever we'realways going to be in this position and I think it's the tradition ofthe Garrick that we continue to do them, and I think we have to accept that we may have losses in future on those particular erm things.

We made two hundred and forty five pounds on Thriller of the Year one hundred and nineteen pounds on Tea for Two but that is after we've made the three hundred pounds donation to Whiston Hospital we made a thousand and eighteen pounds on the panto Wuthering Heights we lost four hundred and nine pounds, but that was basically that we do costume plays and have to hire the erm fixtures and set pieces from Wrightsons or wherever we'realways going to be in this position and I think it's the tradition ofthe Garrick that we continue to do them, and I think we have to accept that we may have losses in future on those particular erm things.

If they did consent, and accepted the money - it was good pay forthis area - they wandered off before he had half finished, not wantingto be classed as figures of fun like him.

Yes, and you get all the animals who are experimented on and you sa there's not a week that comes out and you don't an a report saying, oh well this this, this causes cancerin rats or and you, imagine the amount, the huge amounts of the sub ,whatever substance it is that had been given to rats to cause thecancer, and there's no knowing that the amount that's gonna be given torats causing cancer, will give cancer to humans!

That there is no popular opposition is testimonynot only to how successful they have been, but also to the fact thatthere appears to be simply no desirable alternative: the British just do not like their politicians enough to want them made head of state.

Mr Shreeves said: `Ray Clemence, our goalkeeping specialist, worked with Ian in training this morning to straighten him up and get his head up again.

Taligent says its stuff does not conflict with Sun's Distributed Objects Everywhere (DOE) scheme, which is more focused on

Children will find a full range of activities which will help them to make sense of the world in which they live.

`At common law one's duty to one's neighbour who is the owner… of any goods is to refrain from doing any voluntary act in relation to his goods which is a usurpation of his proprietary or possessory rights in them.

As to 2, they held in effect that the occupier from whose land these things escaped and did damage is liable not only for the default of hisservant, but also for that of an independent contractor and (as laterdecisions show) for that of anyone except a stranger.

It was therefore in their interest to get a minimum price fixed for the cloth.

H's purpose, however, was to punish the tenant for having given evidence (under subpoena ) in an action brought against him by another of his tenants and it followed that the landlord wasguilty of a criminal contempt of court.

The `target' of the strike action was undoubtedly the railway undertaking but it was obviously a necessary consequence of the strike's having any effect at all that it should lead to interference in the performance of contracts of carriage.

Children aged 5-16 years will be given a 50% reduction on the adult price if sharing a room with an adult.

By coming to the house on Sunday Moran had made that stretch of road like all roads.

On Maggie's last night in the house Rose gave a little party.

They will identify and `think through' the issues - or rather do the market analysis that substitutes for political thought - andcreate the slogans and policies in terms of the conditioned reflexes ofthe electorate which can be controlled by political advertising on theissues.

I think most conductors would have stopped and made a song and dance.

Karajan's response to Honegger's Symphonie liturgique and its near contemporary, Strauss's Metamorphosen , of which he made the first recording in 1947, provides specifically musicalevidence of Karajan's priorities and allegiances that I have yet to seeconsidered by those who have become so concerned to analyse and recycleoften erroneous information about his alleged political sympathiesbefore and during the Second World War.

No one wanted me to do the set, so I paid for it myself.

When we were watching the end of the film of Brahms's First Symphony which you've been editing, I noticed you giving a very accurate two-handed performance of the timpani part on the table in front of you.

In an amiable parody of an interview he onceheard being given by Sir Adrian Boult, Gould spelt out the attitude torecording of that older generation: roughly, `I don't mind doing the occasional recording, old boy - not everyone gets to concerts - and we'll do our best, but I don't want any `patching', we must keep thelong line intact'.

In an amiable parody of an interview he onceheard being given by Sir Adrian Boult, Gould spelt out the attitude torecording of that older generation: roughly, `I don't mind doing the occasional recording, old boy - not everyone gets to concerts - and we'll do our best, but I don't want any `patching', we must keep thelong line intact'.

In an amiable parody of an interview he onceheard being given by Sir Adrian Boult, Gould spelt out the attitude torecording of that older generation: roughly, `I don't mind doing the occasional recording, old boy - not everyone gets to concerts - and we'll do our best, but I don't want any `patching', we must keep thelong line intact'.

In an amiable parody of an interview he onceheard being given by Sir Adrian Boult, Gould spelt out the attitude torecording of that older generation: roughly, `I don't mind doing the occasional recording, old boy - not everyone gets to concerts - and we'll do our best, but I don't want any `patching', we must keep thelong line intact'.

It was very hard work but you felt, well I've done a good day's work when you'd finished.

And even during the Second World War er mothers with their children under the age of five er they weren't expected to do any war work at all.

She lied to me, though, when I asked at about the age of eight what she'd done: she said she'd worked in an office, done clerical work.

She lied to me, though, when I asked at about the age of eight what she'd done: she said she'd worked in an office, done clerical work.

She gave a lunch party the day I was there: just a modest little affair, a few media stars, a Hollywood lawyer, a chat-show host.

She received random bits of memory, tried them in different patterns, hoping to make sense.

His opponents, massed in Cable Street, weredetermined that he should not pass, and 6,000 police were needed to keep order and to make an attempt at clearing the way.

Joyce described a crowd of three or four hundred blocking the way, shouting, chanting, and giving the clenched fist salute of the `Red Front'.

It occurred to Karelius to wonder whether the fräulein made a practice of confiding her problems to everyone as readily as in this instance.

Herbie diverted his gaze to them, whereby they both took a sudden renewed interest in their game.

The girls sat down on a large pew-looking benchin the alcove and laughed at Billy who was standing with his back to the blazing logs doing his knee bending policeman act.

It was held that the expert was bound to maintain the confidentiality of the information and was accordingly not entitled to use the information for the purpose of making a television film.

However, the fact that an employer may have evidence to support his claim does not preclude theemployee from arguing that the employer has conducted himself in such away that despite an express clause confidentiality no longer exists.

However, the fact that an employer may have evidence to support his claim does not preclude theemployee from arguing that the employer has conducted himself in such away that despite an express clause confidentiality no longer exists.

It is unusual for a sex murder case to get widespread coverage during the police investigation.

Some see it and have sound explanations, like one Magar lady in rural west central Nepal who gave a ten-minute lecture to me on the problems of the transference offertility from forest to arable land, and changing uses of crop residues with increasing population pressure, that would have stood up well in a graduate seminar.

And he is quick to point out that it was a joint decision to make a serious bid.

A farmer friend of mine came to look the place over shortly after we bought it and he gave me some useful advice: that, whatever happened, we must enjoy doing the work.

There are times when Chancellors are right to fuss with mini-measures, and there are times when they need to make an instant impact.

Mr Heseltine made no comment on the report, which does not form part of the Government's coal review, expected to be published next week.

But he admitted he could not be sure he saw a soldier make contact with another soldier with his rifle.

He is with a priest from Canada and doing great work.

The Factory, which had some influence on Midnight Cowboy , then decided to make their own picture about a male hustler.

`The reason I agreed to do the film was because of the script and the potential that I thought was there.

It is impossible to make a technical distinction between strategic planning and business planning: both use techniques such as SWOT analysis.

`The main Parcelforce ads have had a halo effect on international services and have taken the pressure off corporate image building for us,' says Parcelforce International's services manager Andy Young.

He then suggests that the former can eitherdirectly create the conditions for the reproduction of the relations ofproduction, presumably by quelling any sign of working classinsubordination (i.e., a feature of economic practice depends uponpolitical practice), or they can do so indirectly, by establishing asituation in which ideological state apparatuses can do their work (i.e., in which ideological practice determines economic practice).

If holist forms of explanation are to meritserious consideration, they must clearly be based on more than anuncritical acceptance of a crude version of historical materialism, andthe claim that they are not threatened by counterfactuals such as thosediscussed at the start of the chapter must be given a less doctrinaire justification.

`Well, if that's where warmth gets you - a lonely old age, with your only pleasure making trouble for other people - then I'm glad I'm cold!'

And getting no response from Viola, who continued fussing over theteapot, he added, more directly: `It would be silly to blue the profitsbefore they've even begun to come in.'

I stammered out a fairly acceptable reason for declining their invitation to make a personal appearance at the songs premiere, and very shortly Malaand I were back on our ship as Posi took us off-planet, with much relief all round.

`Language as the origin of history': on what basis does Derrida make the startling and radical claim that writing as transcendence constitutes the condition of all historicity?

As a result, by the time the DET did a survey of farm schooling in 1986, only 3 per cent ofthe total of 5,782 farm schools offered education for more than sevengrades, and 21 per cent did not offer education beyond four grades.

As a result, by the time the DET did a survey of farm schooling in 1986, only 3 per cent ofthe total of 5,782 farm schools offered education for more than sevengrades, and 21 per cent did not offer education beyond four grades.

More than half claim to have made considerable use of the LEA booklet, Starting Points in Self-Evaluation.

and er and so I said to Paul, Ann'll get plenty conversation today.

But we, we got our mortgage from, from the council, you know, obviously

Right, I'll just get the when I get this lock off two three, that's it.

then if you went again in the autumn you you ge you get er fifty pounds' worth of vouchers or something, yo you go half price.

Tony Wilson, whose previous fight ended in farce when his mother climbed into the ring and attacked his opponent, made an orthodox return to the ring last night.

`If you've got some bread, we could have a snow sandwich.'

`Look, couldn't we just go along to the pub and have a quiet drink and talk about fishing instead?' he pleaded.

They were also very helpful in getting weather information.

They would certainly make a safer choice for a first aeroplane after the club trike than does the twitchy taildragging Silvaire and its lookalike cousins.

There's almost no time left to play with the aircraft - and no need, because the flying program is devised so that getting the feel of this big personal fighter/business aircraft comes naturally.

Sometimes management may allow you to keep your room later but they are entitled to make a charge if they wish.

At home my anorexic behaviour sustained me: it was the only consistent factor in my life, the only thing that made sense.

In other words, to slim is to take a rational decision with a conscious aim in view.

The band, Deep Throat, were playing all theseBrontosaurus Rex numbers instead of that underground what they usuallyplay and everyone was doing this smart dance.

Yes in fact, to be perfectly honest with you therelationship is a bit more than she wants Ron is a bit of a pain I toldhim over and over again not to push his luck, I said for goodness sake,Ron, be grateful for what you've got apparently she doesn't like to make love with the lights on I said well if that's whatshe doesn't like that's what she doesn't like, you're not going tochange a woman of sixty eight!

To tell you the truth Brenda, I'm very sorry forher because I think that she and Ned have made a really a quiteferocious mess of their life, they've never intended to be slaving awayto be doing kitchen fitting, he wanted to do wood sculpture that was he's idea in

To tell you the truth Brenda, I'm very sorry forher because I think that she and Ned have made a really a quiteferocious mess of their life, they've never intended to be slaving awayto be doing kitchen fitting, he wanted to do wood sculpture that was he's idea in

You know and do the work.

And anyway I can get them in the sale if I choose to fight my way up to London I can get a Liberty tie for about twelve pounds.

But if you people are not gonna do more shopping are they?

Mrs Lane was the miniature goddess who controlled her large, tolerant, good-humoured menfolk, and made this whole organisation work.

`Care to take a look inside for us?

Those that remain have made a personal investment in time and energy; they have a stake inmaintaining the system that has been developed and replacements willneed to make their mark and have freedom to develop new ideas, from this a sense of identity, ownership and commitment will develop.

The operator is assumed to be reacting to asituation in a control room, containing a great variety of dials,charts, and computer driven displays together with the controls needed to take action in any part of the system.

In all cases the ergonomic requirement is that the task as designed should make use of his abilities and be adaptive to his limitations.

`Clearly the members of the UGC had some informal qualitative knowledge of the relative research strategies ofdifferent university departments, but they had no systematic evidence to support these views.

Self-denial and self-help, however, would make a poor rallying cry for the hustings.

This is a very central issue for any sociology of the global system in so far as it makes the difference between a dismal chronicle of inevitability,which is absolutely not my intention, and an attempt to illuminate what is happening by a theory of what makes it happen and, by implication,what could make other things happen in other ways.

This is a very central issue for any sociology of the global system in so far as it makes the difference between a dismal chronicle of inevitability,which is absolutely not my intention, and an attempt to illuminate what is happening by a theory of what makes it happen and, by implication,what could make other things happen in other ways.

It was further provided that if the parties had not agreed the rent six months before the review date, and the landlord had not made the application to the President, then any notice given by the landlord to trigger the review should be void and of no effect.

Having a religious party on board could make all the difference.

Bright young engineers from rival firms are attracted to Keyence by the chance to do their own research, rather than labouring for years under grey-haired supervisors.

The Afrikaans weekly newspaper, Vrye Weekblad, has named a South African conscript who, it says, was required to do his military service as a spy.

Money as abstraction furnishes opportunities for possession, but mediates in this relationship to give rise to some separation between the specificity ofbeing and the specificity of having, since money alone does notdetermine its further use by its presence, and is entirely ahistorical.

It was a despatch which The Times never printed: its sports editor was out to dinner, as usual, and the subeditor who got the copy missed a major scoop through ignorance.

A great deal of Thomas's trade had passed through the hands of Spencer Grenfell who seemed to have trouble bringing in payment to her father on time.

A great deal of Thomas's trade had passed through the hands of Spencer Grenfell who seemed to have trouble bringing in payment to her father on time.

The whereabouts of James Guerin, ISC's former chairman, are still unknown and he has yet to make contact with Ferranti's advisers.

Conversely their own recorded tales of well-known characters of that era, JTR makes no mention, like Muckle Kate in Brig o' Turk.

`You'd better go off and make a search.'

Presented with such explicitly racist material and asked to make intellectual sense of it, most people's reactions are likely to be anchored to positions in which they have an emotional and material stake.

The argument could far more plausibly be turnedon its head: the `latent function' of the operation of unofficialsuspect categories may be to make the administration of (in) justice more efficient and `rational', which in turn institutionalizes these practices and gives them thestatus of `due legal process'.

Phizacklea and Miles (1979, 1980) argue that, in the particular inner-city context that they researched, white racismoperated not simply in the form of cultural stereotypes but as part ofthe process whereby white residents and workers attempted to make sense of public housing shortages, reduction in employment opportunities, and other aspects of urban decline.

They thought it over and only after their first choice, Eli Wallach, announced he would be doing a Broadway play instead of making the film, did they give the part to Sinatra.

They thought it over and only after their first choice, Eli Wallach, announced he would be doing a Broadway play instead of making the film, did they give the part to Sinatra.

But his main contribution to the development ofthe community came from his choice of priors, Ernulf first and thenConrad, both men with a sympathetic interest in the past, and leavingthem to do their work without interference.

Swain took a step towards him, shooting him a warning glance.

One of the things that makes war so fascinating to its students and sofrustrating to its participants is that in a moment of supreme crisis it is rarely given for one side, obsessed by its own difficulties, to seejust how bad things are in the enemy camp.

Novels have been a rich source of material forthe film industry since the talkies were introduced, and it's veryinteresting to see how both classic and contemporary novels requireskilled adaptation of the dialogue to make sufficient dramatic impact in a film.

To take just one example, FRCN Kaduna's programmes like Democracy inAction and Alkawari Kayane , give coverage of political affairs from all states and from the point of view of all parties.

Meanwhile, Unix System Laboratories Inc is probably going to have to make a business decision about whether to buy in Motif from the outside.

The company employs 1,750 people worldwide, with 800 technical personnel doing design and development of application software for health services,central and local governments, municipal police departments, libraries,international banking, discrete manufacturing, and the payroll,personnel and pension markets.

He wouldn't make me have my birthday party in the rumpus-room with the girls.

Then Sven Hjerson took his revenge for the past tiresome two hours.

Later in the test on very wet days they performed well and gave good support and grip on grassy hillsides and rough stony paths.

You can just go up for a ride, letting someone else do all the work while you enjoy the sensation, or learn to pilot the thing for yourself.

A new Skywalk sole with an environmentally-friendly cleat pattern gives a good grip even on slippery rocks.

Motions, right, black and smelly, okay, andaccording to how the different colour of the motion be there, or thedifferent colour of the grains were there would give an indication of how long this'd been going on or how far up the gut it was, and the damage was okay?

I have the files… thieves, one who took a knifeto a postmaster's throat, one who buggered a Pioneer intake class, onewho caught his wife screwing the rent official and took off half her head with a hammer-he should work well.

I have the files… thieves, one who took a knifeto a postmaster's throat, one who buggered a Pioneer intake class, onewho caught his wife screwing the rent official and took off half her head with a hammer-he should work well.

I was the prime suspect this time because of the Golden Syrup job, and although I knew she didn't have any proof, nothing I said made any difference.

It will also mean that you do not have scope for considering all the potential alternatives thoroughly before making your final selection.

LABOUR is out to double its number of county councillors in Essex and take control of the authority in next month's elections.

That always made her reach, in agitation, for something else, so thatwhen they finally set off she was already exhausted and Paul was angryand full of contempt.

I explained again: about my job description, custom and practice and my right to do the work for which I was employed.

I even have a job title - Special Projects Officer - but I have no work.

Sometimes she walked miles along the clifftops, taking no notice of the scenery.

She poured more wine and took a sip.

`Amanda,' said Don, making a last ditch attempt.

not because that's the best day for them to be in to do their work, er it's not, erm but because that's when the meeting is.

So they consequently did a lot more workErm but I don't think we, if we'd have

So they consequently did a lot more workErm but I don't think we, if we'd have

So I mean y'know j it may help you get a first class mark if you're a good candidate by writing lots, but generally writing lots doesn't ensure that you get a good mark.

For a cup full of tea or a small can of coke, picking up dog ends to get a cheap smoke.

Ian Cocking just about manages to persuade thecouncil that the ramp is worth keeping so the ramp is fixed up but abotch job on one piece of coping makes any trick other then just plain rock 'n' rolls virtually impossible.

Dillon gave no sign of being frightened, but Tweed sensed he was like a coiled spring.

When Galvone leapt aboard and seated himself beside his chief Hauser made his unsettling comment before they started up the rotors.

Chief Inspector Roy Buchanan made the statement to Tweed in the Park Crescent office.

Their job is at home, in bed and then doing the cooking.

And his' habit of arriving back late in the evening after dinner to do more work was recorded in my preliminary report.

Do you want to make a note of that?

That's, that's, but, but actually if they look at the DOPACS times, for the people doing the work, the surveyors and the designers, they can do their work in two months which is spread out over a year.

That's, that's, but, but actually if they look at the DOPACS times, for the people doing the work, the surveyors and the designers, they can do their work in two months which is spread out over a year.

Er th they should have done the estimateMy father just turned round I've had enough of it if Terry's not going to

Yes er I think perhaps the point I'd like toemphasis is that the increase er in runway length is really quite amodest one er and therefore it hasn't had an enormous impact.

In order to make use of the wood, the trust has revived some of the old woodland skills in an innovative way.

Is that the idea of Viva Hate ! that we need bigotries in order to make sense of the world, in order to act?

From time to time they shed meteorites and the odd one will make a small, exotic dent on the surface of pop.

In the autumn Richard took the cross at Tours, in the new cathedral which wasrising in place of the old one where, sixty years earlier, hisgreat-grandfather, Fulk V of Anjou, had lain prostrate before the highaltar to receive the cross on the way to becoming King of Jerusalem.

This delay suggests that he had not intended hisangry words to be taken literally, but at least one of his sons wasclearly capable of making trouble, while claiming to be doing no more than carrying out his father's wishes.

As a result she was present at the importantcouncil meetings at the end of the year and it would be surprising ifher voice was not heard in the discussions about the future of Aquitaine - all the more so since she could be expected to have some influence over her children, and particularly over Richard.

Finally - perhaps one should say continuously -there is the comparison between conductors; and here again, rathersurprisingly, Davis's tried and proved expertise made less impression than the new but not dissimilar touch brought by John Nelson.

His hyperactive life (conductor, teacher, editor, writer and, more darkly, politician) made systematic practice a luxury.

`I do like to do the recording straight away so that the orchestra doesn't get tired,' Arnold told me.

`I do like to do the recording straight away so that the orchestra doesn't get tired,' Arnold told me.

`I do like to do the recording straight away so that the orchestra doesn't get tired,' Arnold told me.

God then makes the wind drop and the waters return, and the entire Egyptian force is drowned.

Let me take the example of religious experience.

Since the invisibility of women is not confined to particular disciplines, feminism has tended to take on an interdisciplinary approach.

The proliferation of disputes over scarce water resources, particularly between states bordering the Nile, Euphrates and Jordan rivers, attests to the impact of resource depletion, as does the relationship between deforestation and desertification.

By paragraph 16: `(1) Subject to sub-paragraphs (2) and (3) a doctor shall give treatment personally.

By circular HC(FP)84 2, the Department of Health and Social Security gave guidance to FPCs in exercising their functions inparagraph 19 and referred to limitations on the use of services, such as a limit on calls.

The Chartered Institute of Arbitrators is completely independent of the Post Office; it offers a simple way ofsorting out disputes using written statements and avoiding the need to make a personal appearance.

If you send a parcel that become lost or damaged, or is sent via a Parcelforce guaranteed delivery service and fails tomeet its advertised delivery standard, then you may wish to make a claim for compensation.

Present day rent free periods can be up to a year or even longer, and the tenant will not wish to make the first payment of rent on the date of the lease where the Rent Commencement Date is 12 months hence.

However, the covenant will only protect thetenant from interruptions by the landlord and persons claiming under orin trust for it; therefore covering successors in title or persons having authority from the landlord to do the acts complainedof, but not covering the acts of a superior landlord or a predecessor in title of the landlord.

3.2 The Landlord shall procure that as soon as in the opinion of the Architect the Works on the Premises are sufficiently advanced to enable the Tenant to commence and carry out the Tenant'sWorks the Architect shall give notice to the Tenant to that effect

It is also suggested that determination by the tenant would give rise to a breach, ie failure to carry out the tenant's works.

It precluded any necessity to make sense of something yourself, to make real connections.

It precluded any necessity to make sense of something yourself, to make real connections.

It is as though he wants to get my record straight before I leave.

It is unlikely that voting by a single shareholder will make much difference to the success of a resolution either way, and so it is not worthwhile for shareholders to evaluate proposals put tothe general meeting.

Conduct within the second category, for example, a donation to charity, will sometimes be sufficiently disconnected fromordinary business practice to make an attack on motive potentially more manageable.

The directors may, for instance, make gifts tothe employees, but only where this can be regarded as `an inducement tothem to exert themselves in future, or as an act done reasonably for the purpose of getting the greatest profit from the business'.

The shareholders, in contrast, at least as far as large and sophisticated investors are concerned, have no interest in increased diversification within the firm,since they will already have spread the risk associated with investmentin a particular company or industry by holding a diversified portfolio .

The shareholders, in contrast, at least as far as large and sophisticated investors are concerned, have no interest in increased diversification within the firm,since they will already have spread the risk associated with investmentin a particular company or industry by holding a diversified portfolio .

But whoever first comes up with something doesn't necessarily get the credit for it.

I'm working with ideas, still writing songs, so I have my personal input from that, plus I'm always interested in the input and suggestions I get from the letters I receive from all over the world.

Note that the target must be an infantry or cavalry Mob of the kind that has to take an Animosity test itself - not a chariot, war engine, etc and not a Mob that is already engaged with the enemy.

The treatment of some shareholders on an unequal basis may take the offer outside the exemption and a valuer's report may, accordingly, be required.

As previously mentioned, if the buyer indicates that he does not intend to make an offer for the company he will not be permitted topost an offer document for 12 months unless a third party announces anoffer during that period.

As the share markets of the eighties rocketed upwards so did my commission and much of it was reinvested.

A few reassurances later and she was on her way to do battle at the bridge table.

The schoolfellows had been appointed to the Racer together through the efforts of a family friend of the Rogerses, andthey serve together for much of their time at sea, occasionally allotted to different ships so as to give the author freedom to range more widely in space and circumstance.

If Marryat made this choice, it was because he wrote from within theexperience of many years serving in the navy from 1806, not continuously but when employment was available: more than one of his novels waswritten in the cabin of a ship under his command.

Marryat - as a writer read by boys, men beingalready too dulled in the sense at twenty to appreciate him - hasprobably, through the boys, exercised the greatest influence on theEnglish character that any writer ever did exercise.

In an address to the Chapter of Wells the new Bishop made the vow which was to cause him so much trouble later:`In all solemnity to teach and inculcate allegiance' to the new King`both in our discourse and in our example to all your subjects under our care'.

Over supper Gardiner and Foxe explained how a few days earlier Cardinal Campeggio, the Papal Legate had refused to take a decision on the King's petition for a divorce from Queen Catherine of Aragon and had transferred the case to Rome.

The ensuing dilemma that arts educators findthemselves in is no less than the struggle to transform reality intosomething which more fully reflects the astounding potential that bothboys and girls have to construct their own lives; to make their own mark.

Willy De Roose may have struck a lucky year enabling him to make the voyage from the Atlantic to the Pacific withouthaving to winter in the Arctic but he did do an enormous amount ofpreparation and historical reading beforehand for his planning of thevoyage so that he was able to snatch opportunities whenever they came.

They seem delighted and although so far we have only had telephone contact, I feel sure they will be able to drive their `new' acquisition for many years to come.

This is the inflation rate that makes the money yield on an index-linked gilt equal to the yield to maturity on a conventional gilt of the same maturity.

I believe this is what friends are for, to give support at this time.

This can be done by using French technique, cutting a step or making use of natural easings.

Other patients give a negative skin-prick test but respond positively to an intradermal test(see p 288), which is more `sensitive' because it uses more antigen andplaces it in a deeper layer of the skin.

By and large, those principles were soundly based although one could take issue with the question of `full overhead costs'.

D. G. James had become Professor of English; he had need of a medievalist.

D. G. James had become Professor of English; he had need of a medievalist.

Throughout the 1980s the government made attempt after attempt to control and curb local government expenditure through cash limits, rate-capping and grant withdrawal.

I'm gonna have to do some work on this and then erm

The lady has, so far as I know, done no harm in the Lords - no one having seen her excepton one occasion when she went there to lunch - and she has yet to makeher maiden speech.

You'll have your own account… with a simple monthly statement and no paperwork.

The new `TORSEN' differential ensures that all the power is delivered to the wheels directly in proportion to grip, giving you sure-footed security in all road conditions.

Quite why Sir Thomas's daughter should be keen to make the acquaintance of some kitchen staff he did not explain.

Rose made no comment.

Whether the Company did help is not known, and for over thirty years Hoyle went on in his own way.

This in its turn was so successful that, withinfour months of its introduction in 1949, the available places for thenext four years had been booked, so that no new applications could beconsidered for admissions before 1953! 1949 also saw the introduction of Rugby football in place of Association," to make better use of the space", a decision then and since deplored and regretted by the Old Stopfordians' Football Club.

Clapham was a committed negotiator, and Kerr did a great deal to assuage the anxieties that existed in the NCDAD and its institutions.

G Those discussions were fitted into a regularCDP meeting which itself discussed `polytechnic autonomy', and in which a variety of views were recorded - the institutions were at differentstages of development; the CNAA had established national status and itsdegrees were accepted currency; the CNAA was known to be giving serious attention to ways and means of giving greater freedoms to experienced colleges; emphasis should not be placed on charters as such….

G Those discussions were fitted into a regularCDP meeting which itself discussed `polytechnic autonomy', and in which a variety of views were recorded - the institutions were at differentstages of development; the CNAA had established national status and itsdegrees were accepted currency; the CNAA was known to be giving serious attention to ways and means of giving greater freedoms to experienced colleges; emphasis should not be placed on charters as such….

And what living or organic forms of data such ascontinuous updated accounts, or records of employment or social benefitare preserved Not only does their documentation create a problem, but the intellectual definition of what constitutes a record is clearly troublesome.

The concept of publication, a creation of the age of printing, begins to evaporate as printing yields its monopoly in the world of communication; so, even more disturbingly, does a more fundamental concept which long antedates printing, that of the stable document.

Once the barcodes on the items have been scannedand the tabulated amount displayed, the purchaser could present a direct debit card (or a charge card) to make payment.

Then, taking a deep breath, began to bawl its head off.

Once you can do this without the aid of thelocator, you will have the satisfaction of knowing that your own skillsalone will enable you to make use of this last-ditch method of rescue.

Since the bombing had started, the ritual checking of number seven Lyra Street had given Vi comfort.

But not to worry, we're going to get somewhere tonight, so let's make a start, shall we?'

`Ever seen a submarine get the full treatment when it's done a patrol?'

`It has made my life a misery - not constantly, but a lot of the time.

But, at the risk of falling into this trap and adding wanking to the list of topics to talk about when I do an interview, I have to say that if you don't wank, if you don't have any orgasms, then your life isn't worth living.

But, at the risk of falling into this trap and adding wanking to the list of topics to talk about when I do an interview, I have to say that if you don't wank, if you don't have any orgasms, then your life isn't worth living.

And as she stared, there was interposed on thefair skin face of a man, a thin man, and he was leering at her as if intriumph, as he would do if he were to get hold of this unusual-looking child, for he'd make a pretty penny out of her, no matter what channel he sent her along, hisnursery, the street, or the boat.

The greater this distance, the longer the time taken to make the final uncovered dash ( T ), and so a duck can afford to lower its peeking rate.

It seemed to me that when the top men from the States came over, the first person to oppose them, to make a good confrontational meeting, should have been the European champion.

Joan Watt, our physiotherapist, gave me a massage.

When the trustee does not elect to continue the action and to give security, the defendant may use the bankruptcy as a defence (s 49 of the 1984 Act).

`Innocent fans,' said Sepp Blatter, the general secretary of Fifa, would be making the draw from an assortment of pots.

Nkrumah also made an African tour, in which he built up his relationship with president Nasser, and went on to visit Nehru in India.

His ambition was stimulated by Nnamdi Azikwe, a Nigerian, who had spent many years (1925 - 34) in the United States doing graduate work at Lincoln University and the University of Pennsylvania.

Yet during his day he featured as a significant Afro-Asian leader, a `charismatic' personality like Nehru who made a far greater impact on the international scene than Nu with his disarming frankness and humility.

Then George Potter retired in 1966, leaving thisnucleus of magnolias, we felt it was a good foundation to build on,although we were careful to make a selection rather than a collection.

It seems likely that our dreams are attempts to make sense of experiences which are vivid butinconsequential (as suggested by John Hughlings Jackson in hisPerceptual Release Theory) and this will be dealt with later in thechapter.

BR made an immediate start on the backlog of maintenance, including repairs to Ribblehead viaduct.

They still hoped in 1980 that the Palestinian issue - the demands of Palestinians who lost their homes in what is now Israel - could be dealt with as part of a general Arab-Israeli peace settlement, that the whole two and a half million Palestinian diaspora could be given a lump-sum, once-and-for-all payment of compensation.

That was Sir James Campbell's undoing in this section of his county, for he had undertaken to get the presentation for Bruce in order to oblige one of hisfriends who had accepted a nominal vote from him, but the friend, DavidGourlay, was only a small heritor, and the bulk of the landed propertyin the parish together with the kirk session were firmly attached to Mr. Ure.

The ambitious exhibition `Genoa in the baroque age' and its catalogue do not tally

If artists gather in stables then New York in the summertime is a veritable art rodeo: group shows abound and it is a matchless time to take the measure of any given gallery.

In order to establish a trust fund to cover this, and the maintenance of the college's picture collection, the CharityCommissioners, after over two years of deliberation, have given permission for the sale of three paintings: a Turner, a Constable and a Gainsborough.

Anne made a good recovery from her illness and three weeks later was back in circulation.

`As the queen-dowager, my cousin and dear friend, gave you into my keeping for the time of your sojourn here - then, dear child, if you promise to have a care for your own safety, to give no offence and behave discreetly, you shall have my permission.'

`As the queen-dowager, my cousin and dear friend, gave you into my keeping for the time of your sojourn here - then, dear child, if you promise to have a care for your own safety, to give no offence and behave discreetly, you shall have my permission.'

`My steward shall take charge of the matter for you - if you so wish,' Elizabeth Mowbray interposed, as if she had already given thought to it.

The only possible solution to those problems is to build a Europe in which national boundaries no longer have the political and economic significance they now possess.,

Remember, you are your own person and it's up to you to take care of your health and decide how you want to look.

The surgeon took one look at my eyes and said, bluntly: `Well, they're a right mess, aren't they?'.

A distinction is made between sales negotiations, where a certain amount of bargaining may take place, and pure selling,where the salesman is given no freedom to bargain.

The ringisho (request for a decision) goes backand forth and eventually a consensus is achieved among the interestedparties, with the president giving his final approval.

Sometimes it may be necessary to give a concession simply to secure the sale.

`Yes… but then, so will most men if they're given no other option.

Oakeshott's theory in general provides us with profound insights not only into the nature of government and law, but more especially in helping us to make sense of the British constitution.

Yet to her each new day had some new fascination.

If sufficient measurements are taken, this is a very accurate way of making a copy.

And did they do any Did they do a trade comparable to the Cooperative?

And did they do any Did they do a trade comparable to the Cooperative?

And did they do any Did they do a trade comparable to the Cooperative?

And did they do any Did they do a trade comparable to the Cooperative?

At breakfast together Fisher exploded and attacked the Church Union and all that it stood for and said that they had done great harm and ought to apologize.

we did translation, Xenophon, I do not know a word of it I do not think Greek alone makes me miserable, I am always miserable.

we did translation, Xenophon, I do not know a word of it I do not think Greek alone makes me miserable, I am always miserable.

A huddle of passengers gathered round the steps of the carriage to get a look at the reading and, lest their breathing distort the figure, Nadia held it aloft like a fish between finger and thumb.

`But he is gaining in confidence, making a new life for himself and doing well at school.

`Despite the appalling business of dropping GMTV in it three weeks before they went on the air, it was far better to make a clean break.

PREMIER John Major was given some Christmas cheer last night when top economists forecast economic revival in Britain next year.

IAN BOTHAM and son Liam create cricket history 60 miles apart today - for while Ian runs out at Trent Bridge for his 114th one-day international appearance, son Liam gets his first one-day England call at Oundle School, Peterborough.

ATP could always come up with a fewmoney-spinners in its annual output, but the lavish location and studiowork on Whom the Gods Love , Dean's film on the life of Mozart,irritated board chairman Sir Stephen Courtauld, who began to argue thatDean was doing too much stage work, and had alienated George Formby.

Only for brief moments did the studio venture away from the formulae and try out differentideas, even when, as with The Damned , the studio cut the film indefiance of its director's wishes.

He finally came to a halt and made a sweeping gesture with his arm designed to encompass the array of canvases on the wall.

Donna took a step closer, her gaze travelling back and forth over the gilt-framed painting.

Pinto, who made a winning debut in Carpi, Portugal, in 1991, and had led hisclub Benfica to the European Cup, had always been at the front among abig group early on.

Colchester were also given a tough match by Woodford.

I had a mental picture of the conductor on the red London bus talking to Hammouda the village postman, of the English boy's friends playingwith Khadija's grandson, especially Margaret, whose hair reminded me ofthe coloured feather duster Khadija's grandson had pleaded for everytime he saw it in the market, thinking that it was a toy or a bird.

Would you, would you like to do a group collaboration on this one, because erm, can you come up with a version that your group agrees on?

It is too soon yet to make a judgement about the relative importance of these different factors.

In planning public expenditure it is better to be prudent and make a deliberately cautious assumption on the growth of future resources.'

I am Mrs who's sort of the secretary and books, does the booking for the hall, he couldn't get that, anyway itoccurred to me afterwards it must of been the grandmother of that girlthat bought the erm, cos he kept on talking a Michelle and that's thegirl that bought our suite and I reckon it's her child's birthday party, she said erm you know my, you know my son-in-law, I said do I?

I am Mrs who's sort of the secretary and books, does the booking for the hall, he couldn't get that, anyway itoccurred to me afterwards it must of been the grandmother of that girlthat bought the erm, cos he kept on talking a Michelle and that's thegirl that bought our suite and I reckon it's her child's birthday party, she said erm you know my, you know my son-in-law, I said do I?

Oh look Terry I've done an advertisement in the back

A late claim will not be accepted where the delay is due to: oversight or negligence on the part of the claimant companyor its agent; failure without good reason to compute the necessaryfigure; and a desire to avoid establishing the claim pendingclarification of the effects of making a claim on other tax liabilities.

Hanson made its first big UK acquisition in 1981 when it bought Berec, the maker of Ever Ready batteries.

THIS year Waterford Wedgwood is set to make its first profit since 1988 and the first of any size since 1986.

They were close to starvation and - typical of barn owls when they're frightened - they sat as stiff as dummies, not making a sound.

By the time I came to do my first talk, her feathers were a lovely tawny colour with large patches flecked with grey and smaller specks of black and white.

Now what was required then was that although thejob was in a rush, the management had to telephone down to the Admiralty in Bath to get the appropriate sanction you know, to, to accept the cylinder with the er bigger gauge bore.

Others relax by listening to popular music on the local Armed Forces Radio station: Schoendoerffer makes an amusingly wicked use of Nancy Sinatra's These Boots Are Made For Walking .

This book has been written with the objective both of making knowledge gained by research more easily accessible, and of demonstrating how in the course of providing services practitionerscan use the knowledge and add to it by their own skill and commitment.

His conversation is cultured - when last did your holiday host quote W.B. Yeats and Bishop Berkeley?

You've got another you've got another report coming from .

And we've been waiting and waiting and waiting now for a week to get this reconciliation at least together so that we could go out and re- count whatever was required.

Although they still did an average of three shows a night, after their stint in Paris this was easy.

Her unique status had given her unusual confidence for a Tiller.

